Alabama, session 2026rs, HB218.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
21 Section 1. The monies in Section 3 are appropriated
22 from the named funds for the 2027 fiscal year to the state
23 agencies indicated, as the amounts to be used to pay the
24 expenditures of the named agencies, and are in lieu of all
25 monies appropriated for these purposes in other sections of
26 the Alabama Statutes.
27 For the purpose of this act, the amounts herein for
Page 1

For the purpose of this act, the amounts herein for
HB218 INTRODUCED
28 expenditures are listed by programmatic area and the totals
29 for all programs are shown by the source of funds. It is
30 intended that only the herein named funds be appropriated in
31 the amounts specified to the named agencies and that the
32 following definitions shall be applicable.
33 "Total" shall mean the aggregate total appropriation of
34 all funding sources.
35 "Program" shall mean specific governmental services
36 required to achieve a specific objective. A program shall be
37 directed to meeting the need of an identified clientele, or
38 group of recipients or beneficiaries, and shall be expended
39 only for such purposes.
40 "Capital Outlay" shall mean expenditures which result
41 in the acquisition and/or addition to items, such as land or
42 buildings, which have an appreciable and calculable period of
43 usefulness in excess of one year, and shall be expended only
44 for such purposes.
45 "Debt Service" shall mean an expenditure for the
46 payment of interest and principal on bonded debt obligations
47 of the State, and shall be expended only for such purposes.
48 "Federal and Local Funds" shall mean all gifts, grants,
49 contributions, or entitlements, including grants by the
50 Congress of the United States, municipalities or counties.
51 Section 2. (a) There is hereby appropriated the amounts
52 set forth herein for the ordinary expenses of the executive,
53 legislative, and judicial agencies of the State, for other
54 functions of government, for debt service, and for capital
Page 2

functions of government, for debt service, and for capital
HB218 INTRODUCED
55 outlay for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027, to be
56 paid out of any monies hereinafter specified, from such other
57 funds and accounts as may be designated, or so much thereof as
58 may be necessary, and the total amount to be expended for the
59 items for which the appropriation is herein made shall not
60 exceed the amount provided therefor, except as provided in the
61 Budget Management Act of 1976, Sections 41-19-1 through
62 41-19-12, Code of Alabama 1975. Provided, however, that
63 regardless of the ending date of any pay period which has been
64 or may be established by the Legislature for the payment of
65 salaries of state employees, the entire payment due shall be
66 made from the fiscal year's appropriation in which the pay
67 date falls.
68 (b) All appropriations made in Section 3 shall be at
69 the program level. Any directed expenditure of funds below a
70 program shall be from funds appropriated for the program.
Page 3

program shall be from funds appropriated for the program.
HB218 INTRODUCED
71 Section 3.
72 State General
73 Fund Other Funds Total
74 A. Legislative Branch:
75 1. Examiners of Public Accounts:
76 (a) Audit Services Program 11,440,704 8,297,871 19,738,575
77 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
78 (1) State General Fund 11,440,704
79 (2) Federal and Local Funds 8,297,871
80 Total Examiners of Public Accounts 11,440,704 8,297,871 19,738,575
81 Transfers from audited agencies to the Examiners of Public Accounts are hereby
82 authorized and shall be appropriated and expended through the fund established by
83 Section 41-5A-22, Code of Alabama 1975. The above appropriation includes funds to
84 complete the annual audit of the Alabama Trust Fund.
85 2. Legislative Council:
86 (a) Legislative Operations and 2,604,076 2,604,076
87 Support Program
88 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
89 (1) State General Fund 2,604,076
90 Total Legislative Council 2,604,076 2,604,076
91 3. Legislative Services Agency:
92 (a) Legislative Operations and 4,995,744 280,000 5,275,744
93 Support Program
94 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
95 (1) State General Fund 4,995,744
96 (2) Alabama Administrative Code 180,000
97 Fund, Estimated
98 (3) Alabama Law Institute Fund, 100,000
99 Estimated
100 Total Legislative Services Agency 4,995,744 280,000 5,275,744
101 4. Legislature:
Page 4

4. Legislature:
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
102 (a) Legislative Operations and 27,950,159 27,950,159
103 Support Program
104 (1) Permanent Joint Transportation 75,000
105 Committee
106 The Joint Transportation Committee shall file a semi-annual report with the Chair of the House
107 Ways and Means-General Fund Committee and the Chair of the Senate Finance and Taxation-General
108 Fund Committee regarding the expenditure of these funds.
109 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
110 (1) State General Fund 27,950,159
111 Total Legislature 27,950,159 27,950,159
112 5. Office of the Speaker of the
113 House of Representatives:
114 (a) Office of the Speaker of the 1,581,031 1,581,031
115 House Program
116 In accordance with Section 29-4-60, Code of Alabama 1975.
117 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
118 (1) State General Fund 1,581,031
119 Total Office of the Speaker of the 1,581,031 1,581,031
120 House of Representatives
121 6. Office of the President Pro
122 Tempore of the Senate:
123 (a) Legislative Operations and 1,917,941 1,917,941
124 Support Program
125 (1) Reapportionment Litigation 300,000
126 Expenses
127 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
128 (1) State General Fund 1,917,941
129 Total Office of the President Pro 1,917,941 1,917,941
130 Tempore of the Senate
131 B. Judicial Branch:
Page 5

B. Judicial Branch:
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
132 1. Court of Civil Appeals:
133 (a) Court Operations Program 5,457,579 5,457,579
134 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
135 (1) State General Fund 5,457,579
136 Total Court of Civil Appeals 5,457,579 5,457,579
137 2. Court of Criminal Appeals:
138 (a) Court Operations Program 5,468,189 5,468,189
139 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
140 (1) State General Fund 5,468,189
141 Total Court of Criminal Appeals 5,468,189 5,468,189
142 3. Judicial Inquiry Commission:
143 (a) Administrative Services 998,411 998,411
144 Program
145 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
146 (1) State General Fund 998,411
147 Total Judicial Inquiry Commission 998,411 998,411
148 4. Judicial Retirement Fund:
149 (a) Fringe Benefits Program 3,569,743 3,569,743
150 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
151 (1) State General Fund, 3,569,743
152 Estimated
153 Total Judicial Retirement Fund 3,569,743 3,569,743
154 5. Supreme Court:
155 (a) Court Operations Program 15,849,845 15,849,845
156 (1) Statewide Coordination of Pro 125,697
157 Bono Services in Civil Cases
Page 6

125,697
Bono Services in Civil Cases
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
158 As required by Section 12-10A-4(b), Code of Alabama 1975. The Supreme Court shall report
159 semi-annually to the Chair of the House Ways and Means-General Fund Committee and the Chair of
160 the Senate Finance and Taxation-General Fund Committee, Director of Finance, and the Director
161 of the Legislative Services Agency on the status of the updates to the case management and
162 e-filing systems.
163 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
164 (1) State General Fund 15,849,845
165 Total Supreme Court 15,849,845 15,849,845
166 6. Supreme Court Library:
167 (a) Court Operations Program 1,347,879 1,347,879
168 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
169 (1) State General Fund 1,347,879
170 Total Supreme Court Library 1,347,879 1,347,879
171 7. Unified Judicial System:
172 (a) Court Operations Program 165,138,560 44,033,204 209,171,764
173 (1) Access to Justice Project 94,317
174 (2) Juror Pay Increase 3,795,000
175 (b) Administrative Services 3,871,330 3,871,330
176 Program
177 (c) Drug Court Program 2,090,612 2,090,612
178 (d) Juvenile Probation Officer 13,161,259 13,161,259
179 Services Program
180 (e) Alabama Sentencing 485,593 485,593
181 Commission
182 The Unified Judicial System shall file a report with the Chairs of the House
183 Ways and Means-General Fund Committee and the Senate Finance and
184 Taxation-General Fund Committee prior to October 1, 2026 regarding the number
185 of court referral officers in each district.
186 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
187 (1) State General Fund 184,747,354
Page 7

(1) State General Fund 184,747,354
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
188 (2) Federal and Local Funds, 18,847,092
189 Estimated
190 (3) Advanced Technology and Data 3,155,621
191 Exchange Fund
192 (4) Court Automation Fund 4,929,063
193 In accordance with Section 12-19-180, Code of Alabama 1975.
194 (5) Court Referral Officer Fund 5,479,600
195 In accordance with Sections 12-23-1 through 12-23-19, Code of Alabama 1975.
196 (6) Judicial Administration Fund 11,621,828
197 In accordance with Sections 12-19-310 through 12-19-315, Code of Alabama 1975.
198 Total Unified Judicial System 184,747,354 44,033,204 228,780,558
199 C. Executive Branch:
200 1. Accountancy, Alabama State
201 Board of Public:
202 (a) Professional and 2,300,000 2,300,000
203 Occupational Licensing and
204 Regulation Program
205 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
206 (1) Alabama State Board of 2,300,000
207 Public Accountancy Fund
208 As provided in Section 34-1-22, Code of Alabama 1975. In addition to the
209 amount appropriated hereinabove to the State Board of Public Accountancy,
210 there is hereby appropriated such an amount as may be necessary to pay the
211 refund of any application for licenses which may have been rejected by the
212 Board or withdrawn at the request of the applicant.
213 Total Accountancy, Alabama State 2,300,000 2,300,000
214 Board of Public
215 2. Adjustment, Board of:
216 (a) Special Services Program 1,518,639 1,518,639
217 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
Page 8

SOURCE OF FUNDS:
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
218 (1) State General Fund - 16,500
219 Administrative Costs
220 As provided in Sections 41-9-61 and 41-9-67, Code of Alabama 1975.
221 (2) State General Fund, 1,502,139
222 Estimated
223 For expenditures as provided in Sections 31-3-2, 36-30-2 and 41-9-73, Code of
224 Alabama 1975.
225 Total Adjustment, Board of 1,518,639 1,518,639
226 3. Agricultural and Conservation
227 Development Commission:
228 (a) Water Resource Development 1,972,321 1,972,321
229 Program
230 (1) Statewide Feral Swine Program 337,500
231 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
232 (1) State General Fund - 1,972,321
233 Transfer
234 Total Agricultural and 1,972,321 1,972,321
235 Conservation Development
236 Commission
237 4. Agriculture and Industries,
238 Department of:
239 (a) Administrative Services 11,935,221 9,527,068 21,462,289
240 Program
241 (1) Agricultural Economic Development 10,000
242 Impact Study Maintenance
243 (2) Agricultural Museum Board 250,000
244 (3) Geneva County Ag-Plex Arena 50,000
245 (4) North Alabama Agriplex 200,000
246 (5) Resource Conservation and 7,956,242
247 Development Program
Page 9

7,956,242
Development Program
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
248 (b) Agricultural Inspection 4,287,678 23,385,645 27,673,323
249 Services Program
250 (1) Industrial Hemp Program 50,000
251 (c) Laboratory Analysis and 2,675,219 15,494,181 18,169,400
252 Disease Control Program
253 (d) Agricultural Development 1,003,874 16,370,000 17,373,874
254 Services Program
255 (1) Sweet Grown Alabama Program 300,000
256 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
257 (1) State General Fund 19,901,992
258 (2) Agricultural Fund 54,781,224
259 (3) Egg Inspection Fund 25,000
260 (4) Shipping Point Inspection 8,470,670
261 Fund
262 Pursuant to Sections 2-9-20, et seq., Code of Alabama 1975.
263 (5) Farmers' Market Authority 1,500,000
264 Fund
265 Total Agriculture and Industries, 19,901,992 64,776,894 84,678,886
266 Department of
267 5. Alabama Office of Minority
268 Affairs :
269 (a) Executive Direction Program 1,802,490 1,802,490
270 (1) Alabama HBCU Co-op Program 520,000
271 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
272 (1) State General Fund 1,802,490
273 Total Alabama Office of Minority 1,802,490 1,802,490
274 Affairs
275 6. Alabama Trust Fund Board:
276 (a) Fiscal Management Program 21,365 21,365
277 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
Page 10

SOURCE OF FUNDS:
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
278 (1) State General Fund 21,365
279 Total Alabama Trust Fund Board 21,365 21,365
280 7. Alcoholic Beverage Control
281 Board, Alabama :
282 (a) Alcoholic Beverage 127,961,935 127,961,935
283 Management Program
284 (b) Licensing, Regulation, 13,939,272 13,939,272
285 Enforcement Program
286 (c) Administrative Services 27,089,962 27,089,962
287 Program
288 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
289 (1) ABC Board Fund 166,991,169
290 (2) Consumable Hemp Product 1,000,000
291 Compliance Fund
292 (3) Vaping and Licensing 1,000,000
293 Enforcement Fund
294 Total Alcoholic Beverage Control 168,991,169 168,991,169
295 Board, Alabama
Page 11

168,991,169 168,991,169
Board, Alabama
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
296 In addition to the above appropriation herein made, there is hereby appropriated for
297 each additional retail and wholesale store that is relocated or put into operation
298 during the fiscal year, an amount equal to the sum required to install and operate a
299 comparable store in operation by said Board. There is further appropriated to the
300 Alabama Alcoholic Beverage Control Board, after provision has been made for the
301 other expenditures herein authorized, such sums as are or may be necessary to
302 purchase the alcoholic beverages which are essential to maintain adequate stocks and
303 inventory for an economic and successful sales operation. In addition to the above
304 appropriation, it is further provided that, in the event any county or municipality
305 of the state shall, during the fiscal period covered by this appropriation by proper
306 referendum, authorize the legal sale of malt and brewed beverages within such county
307 or municipality there is further appropriated, in addition to the amount herein set
308 out, an amount comparable to that expended during the prior fiscal year for beer and
309 license tax supervision within counties or municipalities of similar size and
310 population. Provided further, that the amount appropriated herein shall be reduced
311 in like manner in the event any county or municipality wherein malt and brewed
312 beverages are now authorized by law to be sold shall, during the fiscal period
313 covered by this appropriation by proper referendum, declare unlawful the sale in
314 such county or municipality of such malt or brewed beverages. Notwithstanding any
315 other laws to the contrary, all revenue generated from bailment fees shall remain
316 with the Board to be used for its operations.
317 8. Architects, Board for
318 Registration of:
319 (a) Professional and 870,000 870,000
320 Occupational Licensing and
321 Regulation Program
322 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
323 (1) Fund for the Board for 870,000
324 Registration of Architects
325 As provided in Section 34-2-41, Code of Alabama 1975.
Page 12

As provided in Section 34-2-41, Code of Alabama 1975.
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
326 Total Architects, Board for 870,000 870,000
327 Registration of
328 9. Archives and History,
329 Department of:
330 (a) Historical Resources 3,014,804 1,082,996 4,097,800
331 Management Program
332 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
333 (1) State General Fund 3,014,804
334 (2) Archives Historical 427
335 Collections Fund
336 In accordance with Section 41-6-71, Code of Alabama 1975.
337 (3) Archives Memorial Fund 19,050
338 (4) Archives Services Fund 850,000
339 In accordance with Section 41-6-76, Code of Alabama 1975.
340 (5) Federal Grants Fund 100,000
341 (6) Stonewall Jackson Memorial 113,519
342 Fund
343 Total Archives and History, 3,014,804 1,082,996 4,097,800
344 Department of
345 10. Assisted Living
346 Administrators, Alabama Board
347 of Examiners of:
348 (a) Professional and 180,650 180,650
349 Occupational Licensing and
350 Regulation Program
351 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
352 (1) Alabama State Board of 180,650
353 Examiners of Assisted Living
354 Administrators Fund
355 As provided in Sections 34-2A-1 through 34-2A-16, Code of Alabama 1975.
Page 13

As provided in Sections 34-2A-1 through 34-2A-16, Code of Alabama 1975.
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
356 Total Assisted Living 180,650 180,650
357 Administrators, Alabama Board of
358 Examiners of
359 11. Athlete Agents Commission,
360 Alabama:
361 (a) Professional and 20,000 20,000
362 Occupational Licensing and
363 Regulation Program
364 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
365 (1) Athlete Agents Regulatory 20,000
366 Commission Fund
367 As provided in Section 8-26B-31, Code of Alabama 1975.
368 Total Athlete Agents Commission, 20,000 20,000
369 Alabama
370 12. Athletic Commission, Alabama:
371 (a) Licensing, Regulation and 275,000 275,000
372 Enforcement Program
373 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
374 (1) Alabama Boxing Commission 275,000
375 Fund
376 Total Athletic Commission, Alabama 275,000 275,000
377 13. Athletic Trainers, Alabama
378 Board of:
379 (a) Professional and 150,000 150,000
380 Occupational Licensing and
381 Regulation Program
382 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
383 (1) Alabama Athletic Trainers 150,000
384 Fund
385 As provided in Section 34-40-14, Code of Alabama 1975.
Page 14

As provided in Section 34-40-14, Code of Alabama 1975.
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
386 Total Athletic Trainers, Alabama 150,000 150,000
387 Board of
388 14. Attorney General, Office of
389 the :
390 (a) Legal Advice and Legal 12,980,902 20,690,231 33,671,133
391 Services Program
392 (1) Crime Stoppers 550,000
393 (b) Fair Marketing Practices 1,076,226 1,576,416 2,652,642
394 Program
395 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
396 (1) State General Fund 14,057,128
397 (2) Attorney General Litigation 18,048,081
398 Support Fund
399 In accordance with Section 36-15-4.2, Code of Alabama 1975.
400 (3) Federal Funds 1,250,000
401 (4) Miscellaneous Receipts 2,968,566
402 Total Attorney General, Office of 14,057,128 22,266,647 36,323,775
403 the
404 The Attorney General shall have the authority to expend any funds transferred from
405 the State Personnel Department.
406 15. Auctioneers, Alabama State
407 Board of :
408 (a) Professional and 275,000 275,000
409 Occupational Licensing and
410 Regulation Program
411 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
412 (1) State Board of Auctioneers 275,000
413 Fund
414 Total Auctioneers, Alabama State 275,000 275,000
415 Board of
Page 15

275,000 275,000
Board of
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
416 16. Auditor, State:
417 (a) Fiscal Management Program 1,304,008 1,304,008
418 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
419 (1) State General Fund 1,304,008
420 Total Auditor, State 1,304,008 1,304,008
421 17. Bail Bonding Board, Alabama
422 Professional:
423 (a) Professional and 250,000 250,000
424 Occupational Licensing and
425 Regulation Program
426 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
427 (1) Alabama Bail Bond Board Fund 250,000
428 Total Bail Bonding Board, Alabama 250,000 250,000
429 Professional
430 18. Banking Department, State:
431 (a) Charter, License and 22,495,000 22,495,000
432 Regulate Financial
433 Institutions Program
434 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
435 (1) Banking Assessment Fees 16,998,000
436 As provided in Section 5-2A-20, Code of Alabama 1975.
437 (2) Loan Examination Fund 5,497,000
438 As provided in Sections 5-2A-24 and 5-18-5, Code of Alabama 1975.
439 Total Banking Department, State 22,495,000 22,495,000
440 19. Bar Association, Alabama
441 State:
442 (a) Professional and 7,190,000 7,190,000
443 Occupational Licensing and
444 Regulation Program
445 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
Page 16

SOURCE OF FUNDS:
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
446 (1) Federal and Local Funds 1,179,925
447 As provided in Sections 34-3-17 and 34-3-18, Code of Alabama 1975.
448 (2) State Bar Association Fund 6,010,075
449 As provided in Sections 34-3-4 and 34-3-44, Code of Alabama 1975.
450 Total Bar Association, Alabama 7,190,000 7,190,000
451 State
452 20. Building Renovation Finance
453 Authority, Alabama:
454 (a) Administrative Support 1,488,229 1,488,229
455 Services Program
456 (1) Alabama State House Operations 1,488,229
457 and Maintenance
458 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
459 (1) State General Fund - 1,488,229
460 Transfer
461 Total Building Renovation Finance 1,488,229 1,488,229
462 Authority, Alabama
463 Of the above appropriation, $1,488,229 shall be expended for operations and
464 maintenance of the Alabama State House, in accordance with Section 29-2-202, Code of
465 Alabama 1975.
466 21. Child Abuse and Neglect
467 Prevention, State Department
468 of:
469 (a) Social Services Program 566,931 16,808,592 17,375,523
470 (1) Human Trafficking Task Force 60,000
471 established by Act 2014-199
472 In accordance with Sections 26-16-1, et seq., Code of Alabama 1975.
473 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
474 (1) State General Fund - 566,931
475 Transfer
Page 17

566,931
Transfer
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
476 (2) Child Abuse Prevention 16,808,592
477 Operating Fund
478 Total Child Abuse and Neglect 566,931 16,808,592 17,375,523
479 Prevention, State Department of
480 22. Children's Services
481 Facilitation Team:
482 (a) Human Services Program 547,800 547,800
483 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
484 (1) Departmental Receipts 547,800
485 As provided in Section 12-15-508, Code of Alabama 1975.
486 Total Children's Services 547,800 547,800
487 Facilitation Team
488 23. Chiropractic Examiners,
489 Alabama State Board of:
490 (a) Professional and 651,000 651,000
491 Occupational Licensing and
492 Regulation Program
493 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
494 (1) Alabama State Board of 651,000
495 Chiropractic Examiner's Fund
496 As provided in Section 34-24-143, Code of Alabama 1975.
497 Total Chiropractic Examiners, 651,000 651,000
498 Alabama State Board of
499 24. Choctawhatchee, Pea and Yellow
500 Rivers Watershed Management
501 Authority:
502 (a) Water Resource Development 50,000 50,000
503 Program
504 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
Page 18

SOURCE OF FUNDS:
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
505 (1) Choctawhatchee, Pea and 50,000
506 Yellow Rivers Fund
507 Total Choctawhatchee, Pea and 50,000 50,000
508 Yellow Rivers Watershed Management
509 Authority
510 25. Commerce, Department of:
511 (a) Industrial Development 14,494,652 4,010,000 18,504,652
512 Program
513 (1) Alabama State Port Authority 3,000,000
514 For capital projects.
515 (2) Innovation Depot 1,000,000
516 (3) Alabama Growth Alliance 1,500,000
517 For the development of growth strategies for rural and energy infrastructure development as
518 part of the Catalyst strategic plan.
519 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
520 (1) State General Fund 14,494,652
521 (2) Alabama Developmental Fund 4,000,000
522 (3) Departmental Receipts 10,000
523 Total Commerce, Department of 14,494,652 4,010,000 18,504,652
524 26. Conservation and Natural
525 Resources, Department of:
526 (a) State Land Management 105,920,244 105,920,244
527 Program
528 (b) Outdoor Recreation Sites and 74,263,953 74,263,953
529 Services Program
530 (c) Game and Fish Program 65,072,859 65,072,859
531 (d) Marine Resources Program 17,342,559 17,342,559
532 (e) Administrative Services 13,271,089 13,271,089
533 Program
534 (f) Capital Outlay Program 27,807,069 27,807,069
Page 19

(f) Capital Outlay Program 27,807,069 27,807,069
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
535 (g) Deepwater Horizon Oil Spill 165,929,001 165,929,001
536 Restoration
537 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
538 (1) Forever Wild Trust Fund - 900,000
539 Transfer
540 The funds hereinabove appropriated shall be payable as provided in Sections
541 9-2-1, et seq., Code of Alabama 1975.
542 (2) GOMESA, Estimated 91,352,569
543 (3) State Lands Fund 19,017,675
544 (4) State Lands Fund - Coastal 1,000,000
545 Pursuant to Section 40-23-77, Code of Alabama 1975.
546 (5) Parks Revolving Fund, 66,627,992
547 Estimated
548 (6) State Parks Fund 6,382,961
549 (7) State Parks Fund - Cigarette 3,000,000
550 Tax
551 (8) State Parks Fund, Estimated 8,733,000
552 Pursuant to Section 40-23-35, Code of Alabama 1975.
553 (9) Game and Fish Fund - 63,634,646
554 Licenses, Fines, Fees,
555 Interest Income and Other
556 Departmental Receipts
557 (10) Game and Fish Fund - Use 1,900,000
558 Tax
559 (11) State Reservoir Management 4,015,282
560 Grant Fund
561 Pursuant to Section 9-2-170, Code of Alabama 1975.
562 (12) BP Oil Funds 29,589,705
Page 20

(12) BP Oil Funds 29,589,705
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
563 (13) Marine Resources Fund - 16,140,000
564 Licenses, Taxes, Fines and
565 Other Departmental Receipts
566 (14) Marine Resources Fund - Use 380,000
567 Tax
568 Pursuant to Section 40-23-77, Code of Alabama 1975.
569 (15) Administrative Fund 13,271,089
570 (16) State Parks Fund - DOT 500,000
571 Transfer
572 (17) RESTORE Act 143,161,855
573 Total Conservation and Natural 469,606,774 469,606,774
574 Resources, Department of
575 The appropriation to the Department of Conservation and Natural Resources shall
576 include Alabama's pro rata share of the Gulf States Marine Fisheries Commission's
577 operating expenses. The appropriation to the Department of Conservation and Natural
578 Resources includes funds for the maintenance, staff, and repair of the Governor's
579 official beach mansion.
580 27. Construction Recruitment
581 Institute, Alabama:
582 (a) Recruitment, Training and 2,100,000 2,100,000
583 Promotion Program
584 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
585 (1) Recruitment and Training 2,100,000
586 Promotion Fund
587 Pursuant to Sections 41-10-720 through 41-10-726, Code of Alabama 1975.
588 Total Construction Recruitment 2,100,000 2,100,000
589 Institute, Alabama
590 28. Contractors, State Licensing
591 Board for General:
Page 21

Board for General:
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
592 (a) Professional and 2,891,000 2,891,000
593 Occupational Licensing and
594 Regulation Program
595 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
596 (1) State Licensing Board for 2,891,000
597 General Contractors Fund
598 Pursuant to Section 34-8-25, Code of Alabama 1975. In addition to the amount
599 appropriated hereinabove to the State Licensing Board for General Contractors,
600 there is hereby appropriated such an amount as may be necessary to pay the
601 refund of any application for licenses which may have been rejected by the
602 Board or application withdrawn at the request of the applicant.
603 Total Contractors, State Licensing 2,891,000 2,891,000
604 Board for General
605 29. Corrections, Department of:
606 (a) Administrative Services and 45,436,713 45,436,713
607 Logistical Support Program
608 (b) Institutional Services 822,082,680 73,119,692 895,202,372
609 Corrections Program
610 The Department of Corrections shall file a report with the Chairs of the House
611 Ways and Means-General Fund Committee and the Senate Finance and
612 Taxation-General Fund Committee and the Legislative Fiscal Officer prior to
613 the first day of the 2027 Regular Session regarding expenditures for mental
614 health and healthcare services for inmates in fiscal year 2026, including a
615 detailed explanation of cost increases.
616 (1) Community Corrections Program 14,100,000
617 a. Ex-offender Small Business 200,000
618 Support Program
619 (2) Therapeutic Education in 6,900,000
620 Columbiana, Alabama
621 (3) LEOTech 1,250,000
Page 22

(3) LEOTech 1,250,000
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
622 (c) Correctional Industries 40,271,660 40,271,660
623 Program
624 The Department of Corrections shall not utilize any portion of its State
625 General Fund appropriation to support the Correctional Agricultural and
626 Industries Program.
627 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
628 (1) State General Fund 867,519,393
629 (2) DOC Miscellaneous and 64,619,692
630 Federal Funds, Estimated
631 (3) Drug Demand Reduction Fund 8,500,000
632 In accordance with Section 13A-12-283, Code of Alabama 1975.
633 (4) Correctional Agricultural 5,187,000
634 Fund, Estimated
635 (5) Corrections Industries - 35,084,660
636 Other Funds
637 The Commissioner of the Department of Corrections is authorized to utilize
638 funds herein appropriated as matching contributions, where required and
639 appropriate, to generate additional funds which would effectively increase the
640 appropriations for the Department of Corrections. Any such grant funds so
641 generated and in direct support for the Department of Corrections' operations
642 are also hereby appropriated.
643 Total Corrections, Department of 867,519,393 113,391,352 980,910,745
Page 23

Total Corrections, Department of 867,519,393 113,391,352 980,910,745
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
644 In fiscal year 2027, the Department of Corrections shall report monthly to the Joint
645 Legislative Prison Oversight Committee, the Chairs of the House Ways and
646 Means-General Fund Committee and the Senate Finance and Taxation-General Fund
647 Committee, the Director of Finance, and the Legislative Fiscal Officer on the number
648 of officers at the end of the month, the net increase from September 30, 2018, the
649 monthly retention rate, and the amount and type of retention bonuses paid in
650 accordance with Section 14-1-20, Code of Alabama 1975. The report shall also provide
651 an analysis of the issues contributing to the Department’s progress in hiring,
652 retaining, and training new correctional officers. In addition to all other
653 appropriations to the Department of Corrections, there is hereby conditionally
654 appropriated to the Department of Corrections any receipts from the sale of
655 Corrections' assets which are deposited into the State General Fund. This
656 appropriation is conditioned upon proceeds from the sale of any Corrections' assets
657 being deposited into the State General Fund, the recommendation of the Director of
658 Finance, and the approval of the Governor.
659 30. Cosmetology and Barbering,
660 Alabama Board of:
661 (a) Professional and 3,925,000 3,925,000
662 Occupational Licensing and
663 Regulation Program
664 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
665 (1) Alabama Board of Cosmetology 3,925,000
666 and Barbering Fund
667 As provided in Section 34-7B-6, Code of Alabama 1975.
668 Total Cosmetology and Barbering, 3,925,000 3,925,000
669 Alabama Board of
670 31. Counseling, Alabama Board of
671 Examiners in:
672 (a) Professional and 975,000 975,000
673 Occupational Licensing and
674 Regulation Program
Page 24

975,000 975,000
Regulation Program
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
675 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
676 (1) Alabama Board of Examiners 975,000
677 in Counseling Fund
678 As provided in Section 34-8A-6, Code of Alabama 1975.
679 Total Counseling, Alabama Board of 975,000 975,000
680 Examiners in
681 32. Court Reporting, Alabama Board
682 of :
683 (a) Professional and 200,000 200,000
684 Occupational Licensing and
685 Regulation Program
686 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
687 (1) Alabama Board of Court 200,000
688 Reporting Fund
689 As provided in Section 34-8B-17, Code of Alabama 1975.
690 Total Court Reporting, Alabama 200,000 200,000
691 Board of
692 33. Credit Union Administration,
693 Alabama:
694 (a) Charter, License and 2,808,002 2,808,002
695 Regulate Financial
696 Institutions Program
697 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
698 (1) Alabama Credit Union 2,808,002
699 Administration Fund
700 As provided in Section 5-17-7, Code of Alabama 1975.
701 Total Credit Union Administration, 2,808,002 2,808,002
702 Alabama
703 34. Crime Victims Compensation
704 Commission, Alabama:
Page 25

Commission, Alabama:
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
705 (a) Special Services Program, 1,700,000 3,055,000 4,755,000
706 Estimated
707 (1) To be expended for the expenses 200,000
708 associated with processing SAFE
709 (2) To be expended in accordance with 1,400,000
710 Sections 15-23-1 through 15-23-23,
711 Code of Alabama 1975
712 (3) Victims of Crime and Leniency 100,000
713 (VOCAL)
714 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
715 (1) State General Fund - 1,700,000
716 Transfer
717 (2) Alabama Crime Victims 3,055,000
718 Compensation Commission
719 Fund, Estimated
720 To be expended in accordance with Sections 15-23-1 through 15-23-23, Code of
721 Alabama 1975.
722 Total Crime Victims Compensation 1,700,000 3,055,000 4,755,000
723 Commission, Alabama
724 35. Debt Service:
725 (a) General Obligation Bonds, 17,623,398 18,848,524 36,471,922
726 Estimated
727 (b) Alabama Corrections 45,592,143 45,592,143
728 Institution Finance Authority
Page 26

45,592,143 45,592,143
Institution Finance Authority
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
729 The above appropriation to the Alabama Corrections Institution Finance
730 Authority (ACIFA) is conditioned upon ACIFA being required to make a debt
731 service payment during fiscal year 2027 on bonds issued pursuant to the
732 authorization granted by Section 14-2-12, Code of Alabama 1975. Any of the
733 above appropriation that is not needed to make a debt service payment during
734 fiscal year 2027 on bonds issued pursuant to the authorization granted by
735 Section 14-2-12, Code of Alabama 1975, is appropriated to the Department of
736 Corrections-Correctional Capital Improvement Fund.
737 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
738 (1) State General Fund, 17,623,398
739 Transfer, Estimated
740 (2) State General Fund - 45,592,143
741 Transfer
742 (3) Alabama Capital Improvement 18,848,524
743 Trust Fund Transfer,
744 Estimated
745 Total Debt Service 63,215,541 18,848,524 82,064,065
746 The above appropriation shall be used to pay debt service on the following General
747 Obligation Bonds: Series 2014-A, Series 2016-A, Series 2016-C, Series 2018-A, Series
748 2018-B, Series 2022-A, and Series 2026-A. The above appropriation shall be used to
749 pay debt service on the Alabama Corrections Institution Finance Authority (ACIFA)
750 bonds: ACIFA 2022-A, and ACIFA 2026-A. In the event any of the above bonds are
751 refunded or new General Obligation bonds are issued, debt service on these newly
752 issued bonds may be paid from the appropriations made above from either the State
753 General Fund or the Capital Improvement Trust Fund contingent upon the
754 recommendation of the Director of Finance and the approval of the Governor.
755 36. Dietetics/Nutrition Practice,
756 Alabama State Board of
757 Examiners for:
Page 27

Examiners for:
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
758 (a) Professional and 575,000 575,000
759 Occupational Licensing and
760 Regulation Program
761 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
762 (1) State Board of 575,000
763 Dietetics/Nutrition Fund
764 As provided in Section 34-34A-8, Code of Alabama 1975.
765 Total Dietetics/Nutrition 575,000 575,000
766 Practice, Alabama State Board of
767 Examiners for
768 37. District Attorneys:
769 (a) Court Operations Program 51,301,886 51,301,886
770 (1) District Attorneys Administrative 33,866,838
771 Fund for use in the District
772 Attorney's Office of the several
773 Judicial Circuits
774 The above funds shall be allocated to the several judicial circuits based upon a formula
775 established by the Alabama District Attorneys Association. Before February 1, 2027, the
776 District Attorneys shall file a consolidated report with the Chair of the House Ways and
777 Means-General Fund Committee, the Chair of the Senate Finance and Taxation-General Fund
778 Committee, Director of Finance, and the Legislative Fiscal Officer regarding the amount of
779 funds collected and the expenditure of any funds received from pretrial diversion or other
780 revenue-raising measures in each judicial circuit in fiscal year 2026.
781 (2) Salaries and Expenses of 8,192,577
782 Supernumerary District Attorneys
783 (3) Salaries of District Attorneys 9,223,471
784 (4) Travel Expenses of District 19,000
785 Attorneys
786 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
787 (1) State General Fund 17,435,048
Page 28

(1) State General Fund 17,435,048
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
788 (2) State General Fund - 33,866,838
789 Transfer
790 Total District Attorneys 51,301,886 51,301,886
791 38. Drycleaning Environmental
792 Response Trust Fund Advisory
793 Board, Alabama:
794 (a) Self Insurance Program 500,000 500,000
795 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
796 (1) Alabama Drycleaning 500,000
797 Environmental Response Trust
798 Fund
799 Total Drycleaning Environmental 500,000 500,000
800 Response Trust Fund Advisory
801 Board, Alabama
802 As provided in Sections 22-30D-1 through 22-30D-12, Code of Alabama 1975.
803 39. Economic and Community
804 Affairs, Alabama Department
805 of:
806 (a) Administrative Support 2,577,345 15,600,258 18,177,603
807 Services Program
808 (b) Planning Program 25,361,782 320,131,353 345,493,135
809 It is the intent of the Legislature to provide from the Planning Program
810 assistance to low-income and elderly citizens who live on fixed incomes for
811 large increases in energy bills due to increases allowed by the Public Service
812 Commission.
813 (1) Airport Development Grant Program 10,000,000
Page 29

(1) Airport Development Grant Program 10,000,000
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
814 To be operated through an intergovernmental agreement with the Department of Transportation,
815 provided however, prior to awarding any other grants, the Department of Transportation shall
816 establish and publish guidelines regarding the criteria required for an airport to receive a
817 grant and shall provide this information to all members of the Legislature. The Department
818 shall ensure that the total amount of grants awarded to Birmingham, Huntsville, and Mobile
819 airports do not exceed 50% of the funds appropriated for the program and that any grants
820 awarded for projects qualified or approved for a federal grant among those airports are for
821 equal amounts.
822 a. Cullman Regional Airport 1,000,000
823 (2) Alabama Association of Regional 6,590,526
824 Councils
825 (3) Alabama Coalition Against 475,000
826 Domestic Violence
827 (4) Alabama Women's Commission 65,561
828 (5) Anniston Army Depot 75,000
829 (6) BRAC Ft. Rucker 75,000
830 (7) BRAC Montgomery 75,000
831 (8) Community Action Agencies 750,000
832 To be distributed as a grant to the Community Action Association of Alabama, which shall
833 distribute the funds to the twenty-two recognized Community Action administering
834 Agencies provided for in Sections 11-96-1 through 11-96-6, Code of Alabama 1975, based on their
835 populations below the poverty level. The Community Action Association of Alabama shall not
836 expend more than ten percent of the funds for administrative expenses.
837 (9) Food Bank Grant Program 750,000
838 (10) Healthy Food Financing Initiative 200,000
839 (11) Madison County BRAC 75,000
840 (12) Main Street Alabama Program 1,000,000
841 To be equally distributed to the members of the Main Street Alabama Program as of October 1,
842 2026.
843 (13) Military Stabilization Committee 460,000
844 (14) Municipal Public Emergency 2,500,000
845 Response Grant Program
Page 30

2,500,000
Response Grant Program
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
846 For a grant program for municipalities with populations of 2,500 or fewer residents as of the
847 last U.S. Decennial Census that are a minimum of 25 miles from a hospital to aid in capital
848 startup costs related to establishing a public emergency response program or ambulance
849 service. Priority shall be given to municipalities that contribute matching funds or have
850 already acquired real property for this purpose. Grant recipients shall comply with Alabama
851 Administrative Code Rules 420-2-1.15, 420-2-1.16, 420-2-1.19, and 420-2-1.20 related to
852 Emergency Medical Services within 6 months of receipt of the grant. Any municipality receiving
853 a grant that fails to meet the above requirements within 6 months shall repay the grant funds
854 to the Department.
855 (15) PALS/Adopt-a-Mile Program 200,000
856 (c) Energy Management Program 6,063,195 84,599,530 90,662,725
857 (d) Law Enforcement Planning and 1,003,759 116,616,035 117,619,794
858 Development Program
859 (e) Surplus Property Program 540,953 3,533,813 4,074,766
860 (f) Water Resources Program 3,128,598 7,794,080 10,922,678
861 (1) Coalition of Alabama Waterways 325,000
862 Association
863 To be expended equally for the Coosa-Alabama River Improvement Association, the Tri-Rivers
864 Water Development Association, the Tennessee River Valley Association, the Warrior-Tombigbee
865 Waterway Association, and the Tennessee-Tombigbee Waterway Council.
866 (2) State Property Floodplain 1,200,000
867 Management Program
868 (3) Legal Fees for the Tri-State 538,650
869 Water Litigation
870 Up to the amount above (maximum).
871 (g) Broadband Program 750,000 1,002,000,000 1,002,750,000
872 The above appropriation shall be expended for the Broadband Accessibility
873 Grant Program.
874 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
875 (1) State General Fund 39,425,632
Page 31

(1) State General Fund 39,425,632
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
876 (2) Administrative Transfers and 15,600,258
877 Other Departmental Receipts
878 (3) Federal and Local Funds 1,512,615,998
879 (4) Neighbors Helping Neighbors 25,000
880 Fund
881 (5) Domestic Violence Trust Fund 3,000,000
882 (6) Juvenile Accountability 9,000,000
883 Incentive Block Fund
884 (7) State Safety Coordinating 3,000,000
885 Fund
886 (8) Traffic Safety Trust Fund 3,500,000
887 (9) Administrative Transfers 2,163,473
888 from Federal-Donated Surplus
889 Property Sales, Estimated
890 (10) Administrative Transfers 1,370,340
891 from State-Owned Surplus
892 Property Sales, Estimated
893 Total Economic and Community 39,425,632 1,550,275,069 1,589,700,701
894 Affairs, Alabama Department of
Page 32

39,425,632 1,550,275,069 1,589,700,701
Affairs, Alabama Department of
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
895 It is the intent of the Legislature that all grants shall follow the standard and
896 proper grant process and shall meet all departmental guidelines. The Director of the
897 Alabama Department of Economic and Community Affairs shall report to the Chairs of
898 the House Ways and Means-General Fund Committee and the Senate Finance and
899 Taxation-General Fund Committee and the Legislative Fiscal Officer all funds and
900 grants expended specifically in areas with high unemployment and low personal income
901 levels. The report shall detail the amount of funds available in each program and
902 the amount of funds expended in these targeted areas. The Director of the Alabama
903 Department of Economic and Community Affairs shall report within thirty days after
904 the end of each quarter all grants made by the Department in the previous quarter to
905 the Chairs of the House Ways and Means-General Fund Committee and the Senate Finance
906 and Taxation-General Fund Committee, and the Legislative Fiscal Officer. The report
907 shall include the recipient of the grant, the source of funds for each grant, and
908 the purpose of each grant. The Director of the Alabama Department of Economic and
909 Community Affairs shall notify all members of the local legislative delegation five
910 days prior to the announcement of any grant made to any entity located in the
911 legislative jurisdiction. The five days prior notice requirement shall be waived in
912 the event of a declared emergency. The Governor shall encourage the Department to
913 disburse the funds provided herein on a nondiscriminatory basis.
914 40. Electrical Contractors, Board
915 of:
916 (a) Professional and 1,110,000 1,110,000
917 Occupational Licensing and
918 Regulation Program
919 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
920 (1) Alabama Board of Electrical 1,110,000
921 Contractors Fund
922 As provided in Section 34-36-17, Code of Alabama 1975.
923 Total Electrical Contractors, 1,110,000 1,110,000
924 Board of
Page 33

1,110,000 1,110,000
Board of
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
925 41. Electronic Security Board of
926 Licensure, Alabama:
927 (a) Professional and 475,000 475,000
928 Occupational Licensing and
929 Regulation Program
930 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
931 (1) Alabama Electronic Security 475,000
932 Board of Licensure Fund
933 Total Electronic Security Board of 475,000 475,000
934 Licensure, Alabama
935 42. Emergency Management Agency:
936 (a) Readiness and Recovery 9,117,212 83,976,785 93,093,997
937 Program
938 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
939 (1) State General Fund 8,507,212
940 (2) State General Fund Transfer 610,000
941 - Local EMA Assistance Fund
942 (3) Federal - Operating Funds 12,518,735
943 (4) Federal - Prior Year 70,848,050
944 Disaster Funds
945 (5) Local EMA Assistance Fund 610,000
946 From the above appropriation, the amounts necessary to comply with the
947 provisions of Sections 31-9-60 through 31-9-62, Code of Alabama 1975, are
948 hereby appropriated and shall be expended for the purposes provided for in
949 Section 31-9-62, Code of Alabama 1975.
950 Total Emergency Management Agency 9,117,212 83,976,785 93,093,997
951 43. Employees' Suggestion
952 Incentive Board, Alabama:
953 (a) Employees' Suggestion 9,500 9,500
954 Incentive Program
Page 34

9,500 9,500
Incentive Program
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
955 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
956 (1) State General Fund 9,500
957 Total Employees' Suggestion 9,500 9,500
958 Incentive Board, Alabama
959 The Employees' Suggestion Incentive Board shall collaborate with the Department of
960 Finance to ensure that all state employees are informed of the financial incentive
961 awards available to state employees whose adopted suggestions result in substantial
962 financial savings or improvements in the efficiency of state operations pursuant to
963 Section 36-1-7.1, Code of Alabama 1975.
964 44. Engineers and Land Surveyors,
965 State Board of Licensure for
966 Professional:
967 (a) Professional and 2,280,813 2,280,813
968 Occupational Licensing and
969 Regulation Program
970 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
971 (1) Professional Engineers and 2,280,813
972 Professional Land Surveyors
973 Fund
974 As provided in Section 34-11-36, Code of Alabama 1975.
975 Total Engineers and Land 2,280,813 2,280,813
976 Surveyors, State Board of
977 Licensure for Professional
978 45. Environmental Management,
979 Department of:
980 (a) Environmental Management 15,029,815 299,304,248 314,334,063
981 Program
982 (1) State Match Required for Federal 5,000,000
983 Funding from Drinking Water State
984 Revolving Funds and the Clean
985 Water State Revolving Funds
Page 35

5,000,000
Water State Revolving Funds
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
986 (2) Concentrated Animal Feeding 375,000
987 Operation Program (CAFO)
988 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
989 (1) State General Fund - 15,029,815
990 Transfer
991 (2) Alabama Recycling Fund 3,505,000
992 In accordance with Sections 22-27-17 and 22-27-18, Code of Alabama 1975.
993 (3) Departmental Receipts 831,962
994 (4) Environmental Management 43,920,990
995 Fines and Fees
996 As provided in Section 22-22A-11, Code of Alabama 1975.
997 (5) Federal Funds 23,673,800
998 (6) Federal Match - Public Water 112,000,000
999 Authority
1000 (7) Federal Match - Water 50,943,484
1001 Pollution Control Authority
1002 (8) Hazardous Substance Cleanup 493,966
1003 Fund
1004 As provided in Sections 22-30A-3 through 22-30A-11, Code of Alabama 1975.
1005 (9) Pollution Control Grant Fund 600,000
1006 As provided in Section 22-22A-16, Code of Alabama 1975.
1007 (10) Public Water SRF 3,851,845
1008 Administrative Fees
1009 (11) Scrap Tire Fund 6,600,000
1010 As provided in Section 22-40A-15, Code of Alabama 1975.
1011 (12) Scrap Tire Fund - Transfer 1,610,000
1012 As provided in Section 22-40A-22, Code of Alabama 1975.
1013 (13) Solid Waste Fund 5,750,000
1014 In accordance with Sections 22-27-17 and 22-27-18, Code of Alabama 1975.
1015 (14) SRF Administrative Fees 5,973,466
Page 36

(14) SRF Administrative Fees 5,973,466
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
1016 As provided in Section 22-34-3, Code of Alabama 1975.
1017 (15) Underground and Aboveground 36,800,000
1018 Storage Tank Trust Fund
1019 As provided in Section 22-35-5, Code of Alabama 1975. The above appropriation
1020 shall be conditioned upon the expenditure of such funds solely for the
1021 purposes provided for in Chapter 35 of Title 22, Code of Alabama 1975.
1022 (16) Underground and Aboveground 2,749,735
1023 Storage Tank Trust Fund -
1024 Transfer
1025 As provided in Section 22-35-9, Code of Alabama 1975.
1026 Total Environmental Management, 15,029,815 299,304,248 314,334,063
1027 Department of
1028 46. Ethics Commission, Alabama:
1029 (a) Regulation of Public 2,547,241 2,547,241
1030 Officials and Employees
1031 Program
1032 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1033 (1) State General Fund, 2,547,241
1034 Estimated
1035 Total Ethics Commission, Alabama 2,547,241 2,547,241
1036 As provided in Section 36-25-29, Code of Alabama 1975. The minimum appropriation
1037 provision shall include the reversion reappropriated amount, if any.
1038 47. Finance, Department of:
1039 (a) Fiscal Management Program 3,066,362 20,715,687 23,782,049
1040 (b) Administrative Support 836,604 106,419,115 107,255,719
1041 Services Program
1042 (c) State Capitol Program 3,035,288 3,035,288
1043 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1044 (1) State General Fund 6,101,650
1045 (2) State General Fund, Transfer 836,604
Page 37

(2) State General Fund, Transfer 836,604
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
1046 (3) Accounting and 3,169,712
1047 Administration Fund
1048 (4) Comptroller Revolving Fund, 8,772,450
1049 Estimated
1050 (5) Debt Management Fund, 582,133
1051 Estimated
1052 (6) Finance Director's Revolving 1,014,108
1053 Fund
1054 (7) Office of Indigent Defense 1,690,324
1055 Services Fund, Estimated
1056 (8) State Procurement Fund, 5,486,960
1057 Estimated
1058 (9) Capitol Complex Maintenance 36,245,458
1059 and Repair Fund, Estimated
1060 (10) Craft Training Fund, 9,500,000
1061 Estimated
1062 (11) Education Liability Trust 905,820
1063 Fund - Administration
1064 (12) Employee Injury 6,321,843
1065 Compensation Trust Fund -
1066 Administration
1067 As provided in Sections 36-29A-1, et seq., Code of Alabama 1975.
1068 (13) General Liability Trust 1,156,106
1069 Fund - Administration
1070 As provided in Sections 36-1-6.1, et seq., Code of Alabama 1975.
1071 (14) Legal Revolving Fund 1,812,614
1072 (15) Mail and Supply Revolving 5,000,000
1073 Fund, Estimated
1074 (16) Personnel Revolving Fund 574,411
Page 38

(16) Personnel Revolving Fund 574,411
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
1075 (17) Real Property Management 9,165,958
1076 Fund, Estimated
1077 (18) State Business Systems 28,007,850
1078 Fund, Estimated
1079 (19) State Insurance 7,729,055
1080 Fund-Administration
1081 As provided in Sections 41-15-1, et seq., Code of Alabama 1975.
1082 Total Finance, Department of 6,938,254 127,134,802 134,073,056
1083 48. Forensic Sciences, Department
1084 of:
1085 (a) Forensic Science Services 28,369,002 12,982,183 41,351,185
1086 Program
1087 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1088 (1) State General Fund 28,369,002
1089 (2) Chemical Test Fund, 1,153,780
1090 Estimated
1091 As provided in Sections 36-18-51 and 32-5A-191, Code of Alabama 1975.
1092 (3) DNA Fund, Estimated 6,484,394
1093 (4) Federal and Local Funds 2,823,113
1094 (5) Forensic Services Fund, 2,520,896
1095 Estimated
1096 As provided in Sections 36-18-6 through 36-18-8, Code of Alabama 1975.
1097 Total Forensic Sciences, 28,369,002 12,982,183 41,351,185
1098 Department of
1099 49. Foresters, Alabama State Board
1100 of Registration for:
1101 (a) Professional and 200,000 200,000
1102 Occupational Licensing and
1103 Regulation Program
1104 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
Page 39

SOURCE OF FUNDS:
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
1105 (1) Professional Foresters Fund 200,000
1106 As provided in Section 34-12-36, Code of Alabama 1975.
1107 Total Foresters, Alabama State 200,000 200,000
1108 Board of Registration for
1109 50. Forestry Commission, Alabama:
1110 (a) Forest Resources Protection 14,964,485 25,323,720 40,288,205
1111 and Development Program
1112 All monies received by the Forestry Commission for Volunteer Fire Departments
1113 or Rural Fire Protection, from whatever source, must be used for those
1114 purposes and an accounting of same shall be filed with both houses of the
1115 Legislature before the third legislative day of the following regular session.
1116 The State Forester shall notify all members of the local legislative
1117 delegation five days prior to the presentation of any funds to any of the
1118 Volunteer Fire Departments within that legislative district. The State
1119 Forester shall make every effort to involve the members of the local
1120 legislative delegation who wish to participate in the presentation of each
1121 grant.
1122 (1) Forest Products Economic 200,000
1123 Development Specialist
1124 (2) Procurement and Maintenance of 500,000
1125 Forest Fire Fighting Vehicles and
1126 Equipment
1127 (3) Rural and Community Fire 2,000,000
1128 Protection
1129 (4) Workforce Development 500,000
1130 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1131 (1) State General Fund - 14,964,485
1132 Transfer
1133 (2) Emergency Forest Fire Fund, 793,139
1134 Estimated
Page 40

793,139
Estimated
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
1135 The above appropriation from the Emergency Forest Fire Fund shall be
1136 conditioned as provided by Section 9-3-10.1, Code of Alabama 1975.
1137 (3) Forestry Commission Fund 24,530,581
1138 Total Forestry Commission, Alabama 14,964,485 25,323,720 40,288,205
1139 51. Forever Wild Land Trust, Board
1140 of Trustees:
1141 (a) Capital Outlay Program 16,307,785 16,307,785
1142 (b) Administrative Services 1,615,737 1,615,737
1143 Program
1144 Of the above appropriation to the Administrative Services Program, an amount
1145 equal to 15% of capital outlay expenditures shall be transferred to the
1146 Forever Wild Land Trust Stewardship Account, in accordance with Alabama
1147 Constitution of 2022 §219.07.
1148 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1149 (1) Forever Wild Land Trust Fund 17,923,522
1150 Total Forever Wild Land Trust, 17,923,522 17,923,522
1151 Board of Trustees
1152 The above appropriation is in accordance with Alabama Constitution of 2022 §219.07.
1153 52. Forever Wild Trust Fund,
1154 Stewardship Board:
1155 (a) Alabama Natural Heritage 3,000,000 3,000,000
1156 Program
1157 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1158 (1) Forever Wild Trust Fund 3,000,000
1159 Stewardship Fund, estimated
1160 Total Forever Wild Trust Fund, 3,000,000 3,000,000
1161 Stewardship Board
1162 53. Funeral Services, Alabama
1163 Board of:
Page 41

Board of:
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
1164 (a) Professional and 1,288,630 1,288,630
1165 Occupational Licensing and
1166 Regulation Program
1167 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1168 (1) Alabama Funeral Directors 1,134,867
1169 and Embalmers Fund
1170 As provided in Section 34-13-23, Code of Alabama 1975.
1171 (2) Funeral Board Property 153,763
1172 Acquisition Fund
1173 Total Funeral Services, Alabama 1,288,630 1,288,630
1174 Board of
1175 54. Genetic Counseling, Alabama
1176 Board of:
1177 (a) Professional and 95,000 95,000
1178 Occupational Licensing and
1179 Regulation Program
1180 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1181 (1) Genetic Counseling Fund 95,000
1182 Total Genetic Counseling, Alabama 95,000 95,000
1183 Board of
1184 55. Geological Survey:
1185 (a) Discovery and Development of 4,686,161 3,673,800 8,359,961
1186 Mineral, Energy and Water
1187 Resources, Geologic Research
1188 and Topographic Mapping
1189 Program
1190 (1) Choctawhatchee, Pea and Yellow 457,291
1191 Rivers Watershed Management
1192 Authority
1193 To be a program under the State Geologist of the Geological Survey of Alabama acting in
1194 consultation with the Authority.
Page 42

consultation with the Authority.
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
1195 (2) State Water Assessment Program 802,750
1196 In coordination with the Office of Water Resources.
1197 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1198 (1) State General Fund 4,686,161
1199 (2) BP Oil Spill Fund 11,000
1200 (3) Federal and Local Funds 3,612,800
1201 (4) Geological Survey Library 50,000
1202 Revolving Fund
1203 Total Geological Survey 4,686,161 3,673,800 8,359,961
1204 56. Geologists, Alabama Board of
1205 Licensure for Professional:
1206 (a) Discovery and Development of 75,000 75,000
1207 Mineral, Energy and Water
1208 Resources, Geologic Research
1209 and Topographic Mapping
1210 Program
1211 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1212 (1) Alabama Board of Licensure 75,000
1213 for Professional Geologists
1214 Fund
1215 As provided in Section 34-41-6, Code of Alabama 1975.
1216 Total Geologists, Alabama Board of 75,000 75,000
1217 Licensure for Professional
1218 57. Governor's Contingency Fund:
1219 (a) Executive Direction Program 110,044 110,044
1220 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1221 (1) State General Fund 110,044
1222 Total Governor's Contingency Fund 110,044 110,044
Page 43

Total Governor's Contingency Fund 110,044 110,044
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
1223 Each expenditure from the Contingency Fund, the purpose of each expenditure, and to
1224 whom each payment was made shall be reported on Open.Alabama.gov. The Governor shall
1225 report monthly to the Chair of the House Ways and Means-General Fund Committee, the
1226 Chair of the Senate Finance and Taxation-General Fund Committee, and the Legislative
1227 Fiscal Officer each expenditure from the Contingency Fund, the purpose of each
1228 expenditure, and to whom each payment was made.
1229 58. Governor's Mansion Authority:
1230 (a) Historical Resources 1,120,960 1,120,960
1231 Management Program
1232 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1233 (1) State General Fund - 1,120,960
1234 Transfer
1235 Total Governor's Mansion Authority 1,120,960 1,120,960
1236 In fiscal year 2027, the Governor’s Mansion Authority shall report to the Chair of
1237 the House Ways and Means-General Fund Committee, and the Chair of the Senate Finance
1238 and Taxation-General Fund Committee, Director of Finance, and the Legislative Fiscal
1239 Officer prior to the first day of the 2027 Regular Session regarding amounts
1240 expended and the status of mansion repairs and improvements.
1241 59. Governor's Office:
1242 (a) Executive Direction Program 6,734,957 6,734,957
1243 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1244 (1) State General Fund 6,734,957
1245 Total Governor's Office 6,734,957 6,734,957
1246 60. Governor's Office of Volunteer
1247 Services:
1248 (a) Administrative Support and 132,415 5,038,198 5,170,613
1249 Service Program
1250 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1251 (1) State General Fund 132,415
1252 (2) Federal and Local Funds 5,038,198
Page 44

(2) Federal and Local Funds 5,038,198
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
1253 Total Governor's Office of 132,415 5,038,198 5,170,613
1254 Volunteer Services
1255 61. Health, Department of Public:
1256 (a) Administrative Services 18,191,907 33,391,469 51,583,376
1257 Program
1258 (1) Office of Primary Care and Rural 500,000
1259 Health
1260 For award payments to licensed physicians or nurse practitioners who agree to practice
1261 full-time in primary care in a medically underserved rural area for an agreed upon number of
1262 years. No payment shall be allowed for a physician or nurse practitioner who has practiced
1263 within three years of October 1, 2026, in a primary care service area with a deficit, or
1264 surplus of less than 2.0 primary-care physicians, as shown by the most-recent Status Report of
1265 the Alabama Primary Care Physician Workforce from the Office for Family Health Education &
1266 Research at the UAB Huntsville Regional Medical Campus. The Office of Primary Care and Rural
1267 Health may pay an eligible physician or nurse practitioner as much as $50,000 a year for each
1268 year of service, in a medically underserved rural area, agreed to by contract by the physician
1269 or nurse practitioner, but any payment shall be for no more than three years. Contracts shall
1270 set out refund and penalty requirements for failure by a physician or nurse practitioner to
1271 meet the contract terms. A medically underserved rural area as determined by the Office shall
1272 be: (1.) in a rural primary care service area with a deficit of primary-care physicians as
1273 shown by the most recent Status Report of the Alabama Primary Care Physician Workforce, and
1274 (2.) in a county in which no more than two physicians have worked or are scheduled to be
1275 working within 12 months to repay a loan awarded by the Alabama Board of Medical Scholarship
1276 Awards. The Office shall file a report with the Chairs of the Senate Committee on Finance and
1277 Taxation-General Fund and the House Ways and Means-General Fund Committee, the Legislative
1278 Fiscal Officer and the Finance Director by October 15, 2027, on how the money was spent in
1279 fiscal year 2027 and the names of participants and where they agreed to practice or were
1280 practicing in return for payments from the Office.
1281 (2) Prescription Drug Monitoring 1,396,916
1282 Program
1283 (b) Public Health Services 49,732,332 718,754,172 768,486,504
1284 Program
1285 (1) Addiction Prevention Coalition 400,000
Page 45

(1) Addiction Prevention Coalition 400,000
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
1286 (2) Alabama Cancer Research 265,000
1287 Consortium
1288 (3) Amyotrophic Lateral Sclerosis 750,000
1289 (ALS) Association
1290 For the care and treatment of individuals with ALS and regional multidisciplinary care clinics.
1291 (4) Association of Free Clinics 1,500,000
1292 Distributed to the Association based upon an approved plan for expenditures submitted to the
1293 Alabama Department of Public Health.
1294 (5) Breast and Cervical Cancer Early 600,000
1295 Detection Program
1296 (6) Colorectal Cancer and Prostate 300,000
1297 Screenings
1298 (7) Communicable Disease Program 4,000,000
1299 (8) Disease Events, Outbreaks, and 2,500,000
1300 Surveillance Activities
1301 Including, but not limited to, the Alabama Drug Assistance Program and other AIDS programs.
1302 (9) Fetal and Infant Review Committee 25,000
1303 (10) Good Samaritan Cullman 500,000
1304 For indigent care.
1305 (11) Hepatitis A and B Vaccines 170,000
1306 To be provided to adults.
1307 (12) Kid One Transport 100,000
1308 (13) Kidney Foundation 225,000
1309 For dialysis patient transportation.
1310 (14) Maternal Mortality Review Program 478,000
1311 (15) Office of Data Analytics 1,500,000
1312 (16) Office of Emergency Medical 2,500,000
1313 Services
Page 46

2,500,000
Services
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
1314 To award matching grants for ambulances for emergency medical services operating in rural
1315 counties. The Office may consider requests for matching grants to buy an ambulance,
1316 rapid-response vehicle, or cardiac monitor or other durable medical equipment to be placed in
1317 an ambulance or rapid-response vehicle, from a county, city, hospital, or ambulance service.
1318 The Office may award a grant equal to no more than 75 percent of the cost of the ambulance,
1319 rapid-response vehicle, or equipment, the percentage depending on the financial resources of
1320 the applicant and the need for the vehicle or equipment as judged by officials with the state’s
1321 regional emergency medical services offices. Preference shall be given to grants for an
1322 ambulance or rapid-response vehicle that would be based in a county with two or fewer
1323 ambulances. The Office shall file a report with the Chairs of the Senate Committee on Finance
1324 and Taxation-General Fund and the House Ways and Means-General Fund, the Legislative Fiscal
1325 Officer and the Finance Director by October 15, 2027, on how the money was spent in fiscal year
1326 2027. The report shall list each vehicle or piece of equipment purchased or planned to be
1327 purchased with a grant from the Office, the government or other organization that bought or
1328 planned to buy the vehicle or equipment, the total cost of the vehicle or equipment and the
1329 grant amount awarded to help pay for it, and why the Office awarded each grant.
1330 (c) Children's Health Insurance 85,464,751 446,393,190 531,857,941
1331 Program
1332 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1333 (1) State General Fund 67,924,239
1334 (2) State General Fund - 85,464,751
1335 Transfer
1336 (3) Cigarette Tax - $0.01 and 6,165,446
1337 $0.02
1338 As provided in Sections 40-25-2 and 40-25-23, Code of Alabama 1975.
1339 (4) Controlled Substance 726,082
1340 Database Fund
1341 (5) Federal Funds 477,218,671
1342 (6) Miscellaneous Funds 77,633,815
1343 (7) Emergency Medical Fund 541,352
1344 (8) Hospital Licenses Fund 2,300,391
Page 47

(8) Hospital Licenses Fund 2,300,391
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
1345 (9) Local Health Departments 174,509,194
1346 Fund
1347 (10) Milk Processing Fund 154,851
1348 (11) Plan Review Fund 938,973
1349 (12) Public Health Management 51,556
1350 Entity Fund
1351 (13) Radiation Safety Fund 3,581,016
1352 (14) Vital Statistics Fund 8,324,294
1353 (15) Federal Funds - CHIP 446,393,190
1354 Total Health, Department of Public 153,388,990 1,198,538,831 1,351,927,821
1355 The Department of Public Health will reimburse the Alabama Medicaid Agency the state
1356 match necessary to cover increased revenues for services as a result of fee
1357 increases. The Department of Public Health will be responsible to the Alabama
1358 Medicaid Agency for any disallowance of Public Health Department costs as a result
1359 of federal or state audits. In addition to the above appropriations to the
1360 Department of Public Health, there is hereby appropriated such funds as become
1361 available from the Penny Trust Fund for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027,
1362 pursuant to Section 41-15A-2, Code of Alabama 1975, and Alabama Constitution of
1363 2022 §219.06.
1364 62. Health Planning Agency, State:
1365 (a) Health Planning Development 8,478 1,816,045 1,824,523
1366 and Regulation Program
1367 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1368 (1) State General Fund 8,478
1369 (2) Departmental Receipts 1,816,045
1370 Total Health Planning Agency, 8,478 1,816,045 1,824,523
1371 State
1372 63. Hearing Instrument Dealers,
1373 Alabama Board of:
Page 48

Alabama Board of:
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
1374 (a) Professional and 60,000 60,000
1375 Occupational Licensing and
1376 Regulation Program
1377 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1378 (1) Hearing Instrument Dealers 60,000
1379 Fund
1380 As provided in Section 34-14-33, Code of Alabama 1975.
1381 Total Hearing Instrument Dealers, 60,000 60,000
1382 Alabama Board of
1383 64. Heating, Air Conditioning, and
1384 Refrigeration Contractors,
1385 Board of:
1386 (a) Professional and 1,664,000 1,664,000
1387 Occupational Licensing and
1388 Regulation Program
1389 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1390 (1) Heating and Air Conditioning 1,664,000
1391 Contractors Fund
1392 As provided in Sections 34-31-18 through 34-31-34, Code of Alabama 1975.
1393 Total Heating, Air Conditioning, 1,664,000 1,664,000
1394 and Refrigeration Contractors,
1395 Board of
1396 65. Historical Commission,
1397 Alabama:
1398 (a) Historical Resources 4,726,876 7,168,325 11,895,201
1399 Management Program
1400 (1) Alabama Veterans Museum and 25,000
1401 Archives
1402 (2) Brierfield Ironworks Historical 50,000
1403 State Park
1404 (3) Historic Blakeley Authority 25,000
Page 49

(3) Historic Blakeley Authority 25,000
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
1405 (4) Historic Fendall Hall - Eufaula 25,000
1406 (5) Historic Holman House - Ozark 25,000
1407 (6) Historical Commission, Alabama 4,258,784
1408 (7) Historical Commission, Alabama - 223,092
1409 Governor's Mansion and State
1410 Capitol
1411 (8) Museum of East Alabama 25,000
1412 (9) Pioneer Museum - Troy 20,000
1413 (10) St. Stephens Historical 25,000
1414 Commission
1415 (11) Tannehill Ironworks Historical 25,000
1416 State Park
1417 (b) Capital Outlay Program 8,692,000 8,692,000
1418 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1419 (1) State General Fund - 4,726,876
1420 Transfer
1421 (2) Alabama State Historical 10,085,325
1422 Preservation Fund -
1423 Departmental Receipts
1424 (3) Federal and Local Funds 5,000,000
1425 (4) Soldiers Fund 775,000
1426 As provided in Section 40-8-3, Code of Alabama 1975.
1427 Total Historical Commission, 4,726,876 15,860,325 20,587,201
1428 Alabama
1429 66. Historic Ironworks Commission:
1430 (a) Historical Resources 2,421,424 2,421,424
1431 Management Program
1432 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1433 (1) Alabama Historical Ironworks 2,421,424
1434 Commission
Page 50

2,421,424
Commission
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
1435 Total Historic Ironworks 2,421,424 2,421,424
1436 Commission
1437 67. Home Builders Licensure Board:
1438 (a) Professional and 6,025,000 6,025,000
1439 Occupational Licensing and
1440 Regulation Program
1441 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1442 (1) Home Builders Licensure 4,825,000
1443 Board Fund
1444 In accordance with Sections 34-14A-1 through 34-14A-17, Code of Alabama 1975.
1445 (2) Home Builders Licensure 500,000
1446 Board Recovery Fund
1447 (3) Home Builders Property 700,000
1448 Acquisition Fund
1449 Total Home Builders Licensure 6,025,000 6,025,000
1450 Board
1451 68. Home Medical Equipment
1452 Services Providers, Board of:
1453 (a) Professional and 356,200 356,200
1454 Occupational Licensing and
1455 Regulation Program
1456 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1457 (1) Home Medical Equipment 356,200
1458 Services Fund
1459 In accordance with Sections 34-14C-1 to 34-14C-8, Code of Alabama 1975.
1460 Total Home Medical Equipment 356,200 356,200
1461 Services Providers, Board of
1462 69. Human Resources, Department
1463 of:
1464 (a) Human Services Program 148,765,857 2,863,424,641 3,012,190,498
Page 51

(a) Human Services Program 148,765,857 2,863,424,641 3,012,190,498
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
1465 (1) Alabama CASA Network, Inc. 500,000
1466 To be expended for Court-Appointed Special Advocate (CASA) Programs. The above entity shall
1467 file a report with the Chairs of the House Ways and Means-General Fund Committee and the Senate
1468 Finance and Taxation-General Fund Committee and the Legislative Fiscal Officer by the first day
1469 of the 2027 Regular Session regarding the expenditure and usage of the funds appropriated in
1470 fiscal year 2027.
1471 (2) Alabama Network of Children's 1,850,000
1472 Advocacy Centers
1473 (3) Alabama Network of Family 2,025,000 1,350,000
1474 Resource Centers
Page 52

2,025,000 1,350,000
Resource Centers
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
1475 Of the above appropriation from the State General Fund, $1,800,000 shall be distributed equally
1476 to the 26 current members of the Alabama Network of Family Resource Centers and to 1 emerging
1477 site which is Family Services Center Barbour County / Clearinghouse in Barbour County. Funding
1478 from DHR contingent upon current centers remaining in good standing with the Alabama Network of
1479 Family Resource Centers and the emerging sites progressing towards membership and in good
1480 standing with the Alabama Network of Family Resource Centers.
1481
1482 Of the above appropriation from Other Funds, $1,350,000 of the Temporary Assistance for Needy
1483 Families (TANF) funds shall be distributed equally to the 26 current members of the Alabama
1484 Network of Family Resource Centers and to 1 emerging site which is Family Services Center
1485 Barbour County / Clearinghouse in Barbour County. Funding from DHR contingent upon current
1486 centers remaining in good standing with the Alabama Network of Family Resource Centers and the
1487 emerging sites progressing towards membership and in good standing with the Alabama Network of
1488 Family Resource Centers.
1489
1490 The Family Resource Centers shall expend these funds to assist the Department in moving
1491 individuals and families into Alabama’s workforce and facilitating economic security and to
1492 serve these families by providing resources and removing barriers to accomplish these outcomes.
1493 The Family Resource Centers, current and emerging, shall provide reports and/or information per
1494 the Department’s request to ensure accountability of these funds. The Department shall provide
1495 to the Chairs of the House Ways and Means-General Fund Committee and the Senate Finance and
1496 Taxation-General Fund Committee and the Legislative Fiscal Officer a report by the first day of
1497 the 2027 Regular Session regarding the expenditure and usage of the funds appropriated above to
1498
the Family Resource Centers in fiscal year 2027.
1499 (4) Alabama Sheriff's Youth Ranch 200,000
1500 The above entity shall file a report with the Chairs of the House Ways and Means-General Fund
1501
Committee and the Senate Finance and Taxation-General Fund Committee and the Legislative Fiscal
1502
Officer by the first day of the 2027 Regular Session regarding the expenditure and usage of the
1503
funds appropriated in fiscal year 2027.
1504
(5) Boys and Girls Clubs of Alabama 1,800,000
Page 53

(5) Boys and Girls Clubs of Alabama 1,800,000
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
1505 Of this amount, $1,800,000 from the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (TANF) funds shall
1506 be expended exclusively to contract with the Boys and Girls Clubs of Alabama for TANF approved
1507 programs. The Boys and Girls Clubs of Alabama shall provide reports and/or information, per the
1508 Department's request, and/or contract to enhance accountability of any TANF funds. The
1509 Department shall provide to the Chairs of the House Ways and Means-General Fund Committee and
1510 the Senate Finance and Taxation-General Fund Committee and the Legislative Fiscal Officer a
1511 report by the first day of the 2027 Regular Session on the individual contracts and amounts and
1512 the expenditure usage of the funds appropriated above to the Boys and Girls Clubs of Alabama.
1513 (6) Heart Gallery Alabama 75,000
1514 (7) Transportation Pilot Program 425,000
1515 For SAFE, Mary Hill Family Services Center, and Circle of Care Center for Families.
1516 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1517 (1) State General Fund - 148,765,857
1518 Transfer
1519 (2) Pension Residue 20,773,500
1520 (3) ABC Profits 1,102,107
1521 (4) Beer Tax, Estimated 11,893,000
1522 (5) Child Support Collections, 300,000
1523 Estimated
1524 (6) Cigarette Tax, Estimated 2,400,000
1525 (7) Contractor's Gross Receipts 6,309,589
1526 Tax, Estimated
1527 (8) Federal and Local Funds 2,577,621,960
1528 (9) Fortified Wine, Estimated 500,000
1529 (10) Foster Care Trust Fund 50,000
1530 (11) Miscellaneous Receipts, 2,344,966
1531 Estimated
1532 (12) Public Welfare Trust Fund 35,134,920
1533 Unencumbered Balance Brought
1534 Forward, Estimated
1535 (13) Sales Tax 1,322,000
Page 54

(13) Sales Tax 1,322,000
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
1536 (14) Sales Tax for Food Stamps, 123,849,092
1537 Estimated
1538 In accordance with Section 40-23-35, Code of Alabama 1975.
1539 (15) Transfer from Facilitation 2,239,203
1540 Team Agencies, Estimated
1541 (16) Use Tax for Foster Care 500,000
1542 (17) Whiskey Tax, Estimated 77,084,304
1543 Total Human Resources, Department 148,765,857 2,863,424,641 3,012,190,498
1544 of
1545 No funds from the sales tax for the issuance of food stamps shall be reverted by the
1546 Department of Human Resources to the Education Trust Fund. Any funds appropriated
1547 which are in excess of the amount needed to fund the food stamp program shall be
1548 retained by the Department and expended for direct services to children, including
1549 the TANF program.
1550 70. Indian Affairs Commission,
1551 Alabama:
1552 (a) Social Services Program 388,348 388,348
1553 The above appropriation is to be expended in accordance with Sections
1554 41-9-708, et seq., Code of Alabama 1975.
1555 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1556 (1) State General Fund 388,348
1557 Total Indian Affairs Commission, 388,348 388,348
1558 Alabama
1559 71. Industrial Development
1560 Authority, State:
1561 (a) Industrial Development 68,320,000 68,320,000
1562 Program
1563 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1564 (1) Alabama Capital Improvement 2,000,000
1565 Trust Fund
Page 55

2,000,000
Trust Fund
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
1566 (2) Alabama Energy 16,000,000
1567 Infrastructure Fund
1568 (3) SIDA Application Fees Fund 320,000
1569 (4) Stategic Energy 50,000,000
1570 Infrastructure Development
1571 Fund
1572 Total Industrial Development 68,320,000 68,320,000
1573 Authority, State
1574 72. Information Technology, Office
1575 of:
1576 (a) Administrative Support 2,926,615 94,893,359 97,819,974
1577 Services Program
1578 (1) Cybersecurity 2,926,615
1579 The Office of Information Technology shall report semi-annually to the Chair of the House Ways
1580 and Means-General Fund Committee and the Chair of the Senate Finance and Taxation-General Fund
1581 Committee, Director of Finance, and the Legislative Fiscal Officer on the status of the updates
1582 to the state’s cybersecurity system.
1583 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1584 (1) State General Fund - 2,926,615
1585 Transfer
1586 (2) Telecommunications Revolving 94,893,359
1587 Fund, Estimated
1588 Total Information Technology, 2,926,615 94,893,359 97,819,974
1589 Office of
1590 Pursuant to Sections 41-28-1, et seq., Code of Alabama 1975.
1591 73. Insurance Board, State
1592 Employees':
1593 (a) Administrative Support 9,447,074 9,447,074
1594 Services Program
1595 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
Page 56

SOURCE OF FUNDS:
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
1596 (1) State Employees' Insurance 9,447,074
1597 Board Expense Fund
1598 Total Insurance Board, State 9,447,074 9,447,074
1599 Employees'
1600 74. Insurance, Department of:
1601 (a) Regulatory Services Program 92,234,312 92,234,312
1602 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1603 (1) Center for Risk and 1,500,000
1604 Insurance Research Fund
1605 (2) Fire Marshal's Fund 713,760
1606 As provided in Sections 34-33-11, 8-17-211, and 8-17-255, Code of Alabama
1607 1975.
1608 (3) Insurance Department Fund 57,155,504
1609 As provided in Section 27-2-39, Code of Alabama 1975.
1610 (4) Insurance Fraud Unit Fund 334,166
1611 As provided in Sections 27-12A-1 through 27-12A-42, Code of Alabama 1975.
1612 (5) Reduced Cigarette Ignition 45,150
1613 Propensity Standards and
1614 Firefighter Protection Act
1615 Fund
1616 As provided in Section 8-17-278, Code of Alabama 1975.
1617 (6) Service Contract Fund 52,457
1618 As provided in Section 8-32-3, Code of Alabama 1975.
1619 (7) Special Examination 15,433,275
1620 Revolving Fund
1621 (8) Strengthen Alabama Homes 17,000,000
1622 Fund
1623 As provided in Section 27-31E-2, Code of Alabama 1975.
1624 Total Insurance, Department of 92,234,312 92,234,312
Page 57

Total Insurance, Department of 92,234,312 92,234,312
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
1625 75. Interior Designers, Alabama
1626 Board for Registered:
1627 (a) Professional and 50,000 50,000
1628 Occupational Licensing and
1629 Regulation Program
1630 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1631 (1) Interior Design Fund 50,000
1632 As provided in Section 34-15C-14, Code of Alabama 1975.
1633 Total Interior Designers, Alabama 50,000 50,000
1634 Board for Registered
1635 76. Interpreters and
1636 Transliterators, Alabama
1637 Licensure Board for:
1638 (a) Professional and 95,000 95,000
1639 Occupational Licensing and
1640 Regulation Program
1641 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1642 (1) Alabama Licensure Board for 95,000
1643 Interpreters and
1644 Transliterators Fund
1645 As provided in Section 34-16-9, Code of Alabama 1975.
1646 Total Interpreters and 95,000 95,000
1647 Transliterators, Alabama Licensure
1648 Board for
1649 77. Landscape Architects, Board of
1650 Examiners of:
1651 (a) Professional and 95,000 95,000
1652 Occupational Licensing and
1653 Regulation Program
1654 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
Page 58

SOURCE OF FUNDS:
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
1655 (1) Landscape Architect's Fund 95,000
1656 As provided in Section 34-17-6, Code of Alabama 1975.
1657 Total Landscape Architects, Board 95,000 95,000
1658 of Examiners of
1659 78. Law Enforcement Agency, State:
1660 (a) Department of Public Safety 98,453,135 41,938,741 140,391,876
1661 Program
1662 (1) Alabama Statewide Emergency 1,100,000
1663 Notification System
1664 To be expended in coordination with Emergency Management Agency for ongoing maintenance cost
1665 for the system implemented in 2026.
1666 (b) State Bureau of 12,138,117 34,928,785 47,066,902
1667 Investigation Program
1668 (1) Alabama Human Trafficking 100,000
1669 Partnership
1670 (2) Alabama Metro Crime Suppression 3,000,000
1671 Unit
1672 (3) Vaping Enforcement 200,000
1673 (c) Administrative Bureau 32,748,104 54,610,303 87,358,407
1674 Program
1675 (1) Capitol Security 1,500,000
1676 (2) Helicopter flight time for safety 400,000
1677 flights along the Gulf Coast
1678 (3) State House Security 700,000
1679 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1680 (1) State General Fund - 143,339,356
1681 Transfer
1682 (2) Federal and Local Funds 38,691,985
1683 (3) Impaired Driving Prevention 407,050
1684 and Enforcement Fund
1685 (4) Interlock Ignition Fund 140,000
Page 59

(4) Interlock Ignition Fund 140,000
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
1686 (5) Miscellaneous Funds 3,126,009
1687 (6) Transfer from Highway 52,435,050
1688 Traffic Safety Fund
1689 (7) Transfer from Marine Police 8,345,387
1690 Fund
1691 (8) Transfer from Revenue 1,200,000
1692 Administration Fund
1693 (9) DPS Automated Fingerprint 2,744,044
1694 Identification System
1695 (10) Transfer from ABC Board 17,712,246
1696 Fund
1697 (11) Transfer from ACJIC 5,176,058
1698 Automation Fund
1699 (12) Motor Vehicle Replacement 1,000,000
1700 Fund
1701 (13) ABC Seizure Fund 45,000
1702 (14) DOJ Equitable Sharing Funds 250,000
1703 (15) Treasury Equity Sharing 205,000
1704 Funds
1705 Total Law Enforcement Agency, 143,339,356 131,477,829 274,817,185
1706 State
1707 79. Lieutenant Governor, Office of
1708 the:
1709 (a) Legislative Operations and 705,160 705,160
1710 Support Program
1711 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1712 (1) State General Fund 705,160
1713 Total Lieutenant Governor, Office 705,160 705,160
1714 of the
1715 80. Liquefied Petroleum Gas Board:
Page 60

80. Liquefied Petroleum Gas Board:
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
1716 (a) Regulatory Services Program 2,595,732 2,595,732
1717 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1718 (1) Liquefied Petroleum Gas 2,395,732
1719 Board Fund
1720 (2) Liquefied Petroleum Gas 200,000
1721 Research and Education Fund
1722 Total Liquefied Petroleum Gas 2,595,732 2,595,732
1723 Board
1724 81. Manufactured Housing
1725 Commission, Advisory Board:
1726 (a) Regulatory Services Program 4,986,059 4,986,059
1727 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1728 (1) Alabama Manufactured Housing 4,986,059
1729 Commission Fund
1730 As provided in Section 24-6-4, Code of Alabama 1975.
1731 Total Manufactured Housing 4,986,059 4,986,059
1732 Commission, Advisory Board
1733 82. Marriage and Family Therapy,
1734 Board of Examiners in:
1735 (a) Professional and 100,000 100,000
1736 Occupational Licensing and
1737 Regulation Program
1738 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1739 (1) Board of Examiners in 100,000
1740 Marriage and Family Therapy
1741 Fund
1742 As provided in Section 34-17A-25, Code of Alabama 1975.
1743 Total Marriage and Family Therapy, 100,000 100,000
1744 Board of Examiners in
Page 61

100,000 100,000
Board of Examiners in
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
1745 83. Massage Therapy, Alabama Board
1746 of:
1747 (a) Professional and 652,000 652,000
1748 Occupational Licensing and
1749 Regulation Program
1750 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1751 (1) Alabama Board of Massage 652,000
1752 Therapy Fund
1753 As provided in Section 34-43A-12, Code of Alabama 1975.
1754 Total Massage Therapy, Alabama 652,000 652,000
1755 Board of
1756 84. Medicaid Agency, Alabama:
1757 (a) Medical Assistance through 1,179,054,000 9,338,373,438 10,517,427,438
1758 Medicaid Program
1759 The Medicaid Agency shall make every effort to maintain level funding for the
1760 adult prosthetic and orthotic program in fiscal year 2027. Any requirements
1761 for prior authorization of antipsychotic drugs will be for the limited purpose
1762 of managing off-label utilization. The Medicaid Agency shall make every effort
1763 to provide access for medications prescribed in accordance with FDA approved
1764 indications for mental illness and HIV/AIDS. The Alabama Medicaid Agency shall
1765 not pay for a generic drug that is more expensive than its brand name drug,
1766 net of rebates. The Alabama Medicaid Agency shall continue to fund and support
1767 the PACE program in accordance with written agreements.
1768 (1) Dental Services Project for 50,000
1769 Handicapped/Indigent Patients
1770 (2) Payment of Hospital Inpatient and 15,000,000
1771 Outpatient Services
Page 62

15,000,000
Outpatient Services
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
1772 For the purposes of state share and the related federal matching funds for payment of hospital
1773 inpatient and outpatient services delivered in Alabama by hospitals as defined by 42 U.S. Code
1774 Chapter 7, Subchapter XVIII, Part E, §1395ww(d)(1)(B)(iii) and who participate directly as
1775 qualified entities to receive funding under 42 U.S. Code, Chapter 6A, Subchapter II, Part D,
1776 Subpart ix, §256e. This appropriation shall be separate from and in addition to funds described
1777 in Alabama Code Title 40 Chapter 26B Article 5.
1778 (3) Payment of Hospital Inpatient and 7,000,000
1779 Outpatient Services Delivered in
1780 Alabama by Rural Hospitals
1781 For the purposes of state share and the related federal matching funds for payment of hospital
1782 inpatient and outpatient services delivered in Alabama by rural hospitals. Rural hospitals
1783 shall be defined as those hospitals whose hospital physical address qualifies for the
1784 definition of CMS Rural for Rural Health Clinics Program. This appropriation shall be separate
1785 from and in addition to funds described in Alabama Code Title 40 Chapter 26B Article 5.
1786 (4) Post Partum Coverage Pilot 4,000,000
1787 Project
1788 For a pilot project to extend postpartum coverage from 60 days to 12 months. It is the intent
1789 of the Legislature to view this coverage as a pilot program for the Alabama Medicaid Agency to
1790 review and assess costs, postpartum services utilization, and health outcomes.
1791 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1792 (1) State General Fund 1,179,054,000
1793 (2) Alabama Health Care Trust 433,788,152
1794 Fund, Estimated
1795 (3) Certified Public 3,216,748
1796 Expenditures, Estimated
1797 (4) Court Ordered Settlements 1,541,192
1798 (5) Departmental Receipts, 12,269,650
1799 Estimated
1800 (6) Drug Rebates, Estimated 163,169,407
1801 (7) Federal and Local Funds 7,464,810,109
1802 (8) Intergovernmental Transfers, 641,411,850
1803 Estimated
Page 63

641,411,850
Estimated
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
1804 (9) Medicaid Emergency Reserve 100,000,000
1805 Fund
1806 (10) Transfer from Department of 27,736,403
1807 Human Resources
1808 (11) Transfer from Department of 235,361,774
1809 Mental Health
1810 (12) Transfer from Department of 33,434,371
1811 Public Health
1812 (13) Transfer from Department of 11,635,381
1813 Rehabilitation Services
1814 (14) Transfer from Department of 33,475,718
1815 Senior Services
1816 (15) Transfer from Department of 4,622,368
1817 Youth Services
1818 (16) Transfer from Medicaid 26,227,165
1819 Trust Fund, Estimated
1820 (17) Transfer from Public 51,820,524
1821 Schools, Estimated
1822 (18) Unencumbered Balance 93,852,626
1823 Brought Forward, Estimated
1824 Total Medicaid Agency, Alabama 1,179,054,000 9,338,373,438 10,517,427,438
1825 85. Medical Cannabis Commission,
1826 Alabama:
1827 (a) Professional and 1,000,000 2,000,000 3,000,000
1828 Occupational Licensing and
1829 Regulation Program
1830 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1831 (1) State General Fund 1,000,000
1832 (2) Medical Cannabis Commission 2,000,000
1833 Fund
Page 64

2,000,000
Fund
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
1834 Total Medical Cannabis Commission, 1,000,000 2,000,000 3,000,000
1835 Alabama
1836 86. Mental Health, Department of:
1837 (a) Substance Abuse Program 9,900,542 106,204,369 116,104,911
1838 (1) Calhoun County Substance Abuse 135,000
1839 Prevention Services
1840 (2) Community Provider Rate Increase 3,482,142
1841 (b) Administrative Services 7,088,451 33,313,847 40,402,298
1842 Program
1843 (c) Special Services Program 6,284,484 11,534,249 17,818,733
1844 (1) Alabama Interagency Autism 60,000
1845 Coordinating Council
1846 (2) Substance Abuse Prevention 310,000
1847 Services
1848 (3) For services to Children and 4,750,000
1849 Youth with Severe Emotional
1850 Disturbance or Autism Spectrum
1851 Disorder
1852 (d) Institutional Treatment and 64,291,228 634,117,426 698,408,654
1853 Care of Intellectually
1854 Disabled Program
1855 (1) Residential Habilitation Provider 1,237,025
1856 Rates Increase
1857 (2) Community Provider Rate Increase 11,071,429
1858 (e) Institutional Treatment and 155,874,844 346,479,007 502,353,851
1859 Care of Mental Illness
1860 Program
1861 (1) Anti-Eviction Defense Program 325,000
1862 (2) Civil Commitment / Residential 8,000,000
1863 Services
Page 65

8,000,000
Services
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
1864 To increase the number of civil commitment beds and prevent the loss of current civil
1865 commitment beds due to lack of financial sustainability.
1866 (3) Increase the number of civil 2,500,000
1867 commitment beds above the funded
1868 amount in FY26
1869 (4) Community Mental Health Centers 6,250,000
1870 The funding provided in this act for community mental health centers shall be combined with
1871 $5,750,000 of the funding provided in the Education Trust Fund appropriations act, so that a
1872 total of at least $10,000,000 in state funds is allocated to community mental health centers.
1873 (5) Crisis Intervention Training 1,000,000
1874 Program
1875 (6) Existing Six Crisis Diversion 36,000,000
1876 Centers within the State
1877 In fiscal year 2027, the Department shall report to the Chair of the House Ways and
1878 Means-General Fund Committee and the Chair of the Senate Finance and Taxation-General Fund
1879 Committee, the Director of Finance, and the Legislative Fiscal Officer regarding the status of
1880 construction of each center and, if completed, the operating expenses of each center, including
1881 the number of employees, and the number of persons served at each center.
1882 (7) Existing Five Rural Crisis Care 6,000,000
1883 Programs
1884 In fiscal year 2027, the Department shall report to the Chair of the House Ways and
1885 Means-General Fund Committee and the Chair of the Finance and Taxation-General Fund Committee,
1886 the Director of Finance, and the Legislative Fiscal Officer regarding the status of
1887 construction, if any, for the five programs and, if completed, the operating expenses of the
1888 programs, including the number of employees, and the number of persons served through each
1889 program.
1890 (8) Pilot Program for Mobile Crisis 5,000,000
1891 Centers for Children and
1892 Adolescents
Page 66

5,000,000
Adolescents
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
1893 In fiscal year 2027, the Department shall report to the Chair of the House Ways and
1894 Means-General Fund Committee and the Chair of the Senate Finance and Taxation-General Fund
1895 Committee, the Finance Director, and the Legislative Fiscal Officer regarding the expenses of
1896 the pilot program, including the number of employees, and the number of persons served by the
1897 mobile crisis centers.
1898 (9) Stepping Up Initiative Expansion 1,829,250
1899 (10) To Comply with the Terms of the 3,715,000
1900 Consent Decree in Hunter v.
1901 Beshear
1902 (11) Veteran's PTSD Treatment Program 200,000
1903 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1904 (1) State General Fund - 243,439,549
1905 Transfer
1906 (2) Federal and Local Funds, 882,688,378
1907 Estimated
1908 (3) Indigent Offender 115,000
1909 Alcohol/Drug Treatment Fund
1910 (4) Special Mental Health Trust 243,206,985
1911 Fund, Estimated
1912 (5) Cigarette Tax 4,018,178
1913 (6) Departmental Receipts 1,495,357
1914 (7) Alabama Behavioral Analyst 40,000
1915 Licensing Board Fund
1916 (8) Mental Health Contingency 85,000
1917 Fund
1918 Total Mental Health, Department of 243,439,549 1,131,648,898 1,375,088,447
1919 87. Midwifery, State Board of:
1920 (a) Alabama State Board of 25,000 25,000
1921 Midwifery Program
1922 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
Page 67

SOURCE OF FUNDS:
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
1923 (1) State Board of Midwifery 25,000
1924 Fund
1925 As provided in Section 34-19-13, Code of Alabama 1975.
1926 Total Midwifery, State Board of 25,000 25,000
1927 88. Military Department:
1928 (a) Military Operations Program 11,939,501 11,939,501
1929 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1930 (1) State General Fund - Active 3,222
1931 Military Service
1932 (2) State General Fund - JEEP 313,334
1933 Program
1934 (3) State General Fund - 10,405,478
1935 Operations
1936 (4) State General Fund - State 1,217,467
1937 Share Utilities
1938 Total Military Department 11,939,501 11,939,501
1939 89. Military Department - Armory
1940 Commission of Alabama:
1941 (a) Military Operations Program 83,987,110 83,987,110
1942 (b) Capital Outlay Program 4,000,000 7,500,000 11,500,000
1943 (1) Armory Maintenance and 1,000,000
1944 Revitalization
1945 In fiscal year 2027, the Military Department-Armory Commission shall report to the Chairs of
1946 the House Ways and Means-General Fund Committee and the Senate Finance and Taxation-General
1947 Fund Committee, the Director of Finance, and the Legislative Fiscal Officer regarding the
1948 physical condition of the armories and the expenditure and use of these funds.
1949 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1950 (1) State General Fund 4,000,000
1951 (2) Federal and Local Funds 79,378,943
Page 68

(2) Federal and Local Funds 79,378,943
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
1952 (3) Federal Counter Drug - US 39,000
1953 Attorney Fund
1954 (4) Military - Federal Air Fund 10,352,167
1955 (5) Military Department 1,717,000
1956 Billeting Revolving Fund,
1957 Estimated
1958 Total Military Department - Armory 4,000,000 91,487,110 95,487,110
1959 Commission of Alabama
1960 90. Nursing Home Administrators,
1961 Board of Examiners of:
1962 (a) Professional and 120,000 120,000
1963 Occupational Licensing and
1964 Regulation Program
1965 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1966 (1) Board of Examiners of 120,000
1967 Nursing Home Administrators
1968 Fund
1969 As provided in Section 34-20-7, Code of Alabama 1975.
1970 Total Nursing Home Administrators, 120,000 120,000
1971 Board of Examiners of
1972 91. Occupational Therapy, Alabama
1973 State Board of:
1974 (a) Professional and 427,698 427,698
1975 Occupational Licensing and
1976 Regulation Program
1977 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1978 (1) Board of Occupational 427,698
1979 Therapy Fund
1980 As provided in Section 34-39-6, Code of Alabama 1975.
Page 69

As provided in Section 34-39-6, Code of Alabama 1975.
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
1981 Total Occupational Therapy, 427,698 427,698
1982 Alabama State Board of
1983 92. Oil and Gas Board:
1984 (a) Management and Regulation of 4,237,827 797,319 5,035,146
1985 Oil and Gas Exploration and
1986 Development Program
1987 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1988 (1) State General Fund 4,237,827
1989 (2) Oil and Gas Board Special 747,319
1990 Fund
1991 (3) Surety Bond Deposits, 50,000
1992 Estimated
1993 As provided in Section 9-17-6, Code of Alabama 1975.
1994 Total Oil and Gas Board 4,237,827 797,319 5,035,146
1995 93. Onsite Wastewater Board,
1996 Alabama:
1997 (a) Professional and 723,449 723,449
1998 Occupational Licensing and
1999 Regulation Program
2000 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2001 (1) Alabama Onsite Wastewater 723,449
2002 Fund
2003 As provided in Section 34-21A-6, Code of Alabama 1975.
2004 Total Onsite Wastewater Board, 723,449 723,449
2005 Alabama
2006 94. Optometry, Alabama Board Of:
2007 (a) Professional and 451,362 451,362
2008 Occupational Licensing and
2009 Regulation Program
2010 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
Page 70

SOURCE OF FUNDS:
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
2011 (1) Optometry Board Fund 451,362
2012 Total Optometry, Alabama Board Of 451,362 451,362
2013 95. Pardons and Paroles, Board of:
2014 (a) Administration of Pardons 90,647,110 9,100,000 99,747,110
2015 and Paroles Program
2016 (1) Alabama Prison Arts and Education 200,000
2017 Project
2018 (2) Electronic Monitoring Program 800,000
2019 (3) Pilot Program to Support Small 125,000
2020 Business Development by
2021 Ex-offenders
2022 In collaboration with the Department of Corrections.
2023 (4) Reentry Services Program 100,000
2024 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2025 (1) State General Fund 90,647,110
2026 (2) Probationers Upkeep Fund, 9,100,000
2027 Estimated
2028 As provided in Section 15-22-2, Code of Alabama 1975.
2029 Total Pardons and Paroles, Board 90,647,110 9,100,000 99,747,110
2030 of
2031 96. Peace Officers' Annuity and
2032 Benefit Fund Board, Alabama:
2033 (a) Retirement Systems Program 1,189,000 1,189,000
2034 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2035 (1) Peace Officers' Annuity and 1,189,000
2036 Benefit Fund
2037 As provided in Section 36-21-66, Code of Alabama 1975.
2038 Total Peace Officers' Annuity and 1,189,000 1,189,000
2039 Benefit Fund Board, Alabama
2040 97. Personnel Department, State:
Page 71

97. Personnel Department, State:
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
2041 (a) Administrative Support 13,000,000 13,000,000
2042 Services Program
2043 Transfers to the State Personnel Department shall be as follows:
2044 (1) Agriculture and Industries, 144,874
2045 Department of
2046 (2) Alcoholic Beverage Control Board 371,361
2047 (3) Soil and Water Conservation 3,514
2048 Committee, State
2049 (4) Agricultural and Conservation 1,952
2050 Development Commission
2051 (5) Agricultural Museum Board 781
2052 (6) Alabama Office of Minority 1,952
2053 Affairs
2054 (7) Architects, Board of Registration 1,562
2055 of
2056 (8) Archives and History, Department 29,287
2057 of
2058 (9) Arts, Alabama State Council on 5,857
2059 the
2060 (10) Attorney General, Office of the 67,165
2061 (11) Auditor, State 3,514
2062 (12) Bail Bonding Board, Alabama 390
2063 Professional
2064 (13) Banking Department, State 37,878
2065 (14) Child Abuse and Neglect 10,153
2066 Prevention, Department of
2067 (15) Chiropractic Examiners, Alabama 2,733
2068 State Board of
2069 (16) Choctawhatchee, Pea and Yellow 1,171
2070 Rivers Watershed Management
2071 Authority
2072 (17) Commerce, Department of 26,944
Page 72

(17) Commerce, Department of 26,944
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
2073 (18) Conservation and Natural 523,264
2074 Resources, Department of
2075 (19) Corrections, Department of 1,339,399
2076 (20) Cosmetology, Alabama Board of 10,543
2077 (21) Ethics Commission, Alabama 5,467
2078 (22) Counseling, Alabama Board of 390
2079 Examiners in
2080 (23) Court Reporting, Alabama Board of 390
2081 (24) Credit Union Administration 4,295
2082 (25) Crime Victims Compensation 8,981
2083 Commission, Alabama
2084 (26) Dietetics and Nutrition Practice, 1,952
2085 State Board of Examiners for
2086 (27) Early Childhood Education 109,729
2087 (28) Economic and Community Affairs, 66,384
2088 Department of
2089 (29) Education, Department of 356,522
2090 (30) Educational Television Commission 16,401
2091 (31) Electrical Contractors Board 1,562
2092 (32) Emergency Management Agency, 46,469
2093 Alabama
2094 (33) Engineers and Land Surveyors, 3,514
2095 State Board of Licensure of
2096 Professional
2097 (34) Environmental Management, 233,516
2098 Department of
2099 (35) Examiners of Public Accounts 84,738
2100 (36) Finance, Department of 156,198
2101 (37) Forensic Sciences, Department of 89,814
2102 (38) Foresters, Alabama State Board of 390
2103 Registration for
Page 73

390
Registration for
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
2104 (39) Forestry Commission, Alabama 98,795
2105 (40) Funeral Services, Alabama Board 3,124
2106 of
2107 (41) General Contractors, State 6,248
2108 Licensing Board for
2109 (42) Geological Survey 19,134
2110 (43) Governor's Mansion Authority 1,562
2111 (44) Governor's Office 18,744
2112 (45) Health Planning and Development 4,295
2113 Agency, State
2114 (46) Hearing Instrument Dealers 390
2115 (47) Heating, Air Conditioning and 5,076
2116 Refrigeration Contractors, Board
2117 of
2118 (48) Historical Commission, Alabama 27,725
2119 (49) Home Builders Licensure Board 9,372
2120 (50) Home Medical Equipment Services 390
2121 Provider Board
2122 (51) Human Resources, Department of 1,595,564
2123 (52) Indian Affairs Commission 1,171
2124 (53) Insurance, Department of 74,975
2125 (54) Judicial Inquiry Commission 2,733
2126 (55) Labor, Department of 237,421
2127 (56) Liquefied Petroleum Gas Board 3,124
2128 (57) Manufactured Housing Commission, 10,153
2129 Alabama
2130 (58) Massage Therapy, Alabama Board of 781
2131 (59) Medicaid Agency, Alabama 246,403
2132 (60) Medical Cannabis Commission 2,733
2133 (61) Mental Health, Department of 530,293
2134 (62) Military Department 100,748
Page 74

(62) Military Department 100,748
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
2135 (63) Nursing Home Administrators, 390
2136 Board of Examiners of
2137 (64) Nursing, Alabama Board of 29,287
2138 (65) Occupational Therapy, Board of 781
2139 (66) Office of Information Technology 46,078
2140 (67) Oil and Gas Board 11,324
2141 (68) Onsite Wastewater Board 1,562
2142 (69) Pardons and Paroles, Board of 316,301
2143 (70) Peace Officers' Annuity and 1,171
2144 Benefit Fund, Alabama
2145 (71) Peace Officers' Standards and 2,733
2146 Training Commission, Alabama
2147 (72) Physical Fitness, Commission on 1,562
2148 (73) Physical Therapy, Board of 1,562
2149 (74) Plumbers and Gas Fitters 5,857
2150 Examining Board
2151 (75) Polygraph Examiners, Board of 390
2152 (76) Port Authority, Alabama State 21,477
2153 (77) Psychology, Alabama Board of 781
2154 Examiners in
2155 (78) Public Education Employees' 13,667
2156 Health Insurance Board (PEEHIP)
2157 (79) Public Health (Contract Team) 245,000
2158 (80) Public Library Service, Alabama 12,886
2159 (81) Public Service Commission 25,773
2160 (82) Real Estate Appraisers Board, 2,343
2161 Alabama
2162 (83) Real Estate Commission, Alabama 13,667
2163 (84) Rehabilitation Services, 313,177
2164 Department of
2165 (85) Retirement Systems 134,721
Page 75

(85) Retirement Systems 134,721
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
2166 (86) Revenue, Department of 479,919
2167 (87) Secretary of State 14,839
2168 (88) Securities Commission 28,506
2169 (89) Security Regulatory Board, 781
2170 Alabama
2171 (90) Senior Services, Department of 24,211
2172 (91) Social Work Examiners, Alabama 1,562
2173 State Board of
2174 (92) Speech Pathology and Audiology, 390
2175 Alabama Board of Examiners for
2176 (93) State Employees' Insurance Board 17,182
2177 (94) State Law Enforcement Agency 540,836
2178 (95) Surface Mining Commission, 8,591
2179 Alabama
2180 (96) Tax Tribunal, Alabama 2,343
2181 (97) Tourism Department, Alabama 26,554
2182 (98) Transportation, Alabama 1,676,024
2183 Department of
2184 (99) Transportation, Alabama 980,000
2185 Department of (Contract Team)
2186 (100) Treasurer, State 10,543
2187 (101) Veterans Affairs, Department of 11,324
2188 (102) Veterinary Medical Examiners, 2,343
2189 Alabama State Board of
2190 (103) Youth Services, Department of 162,056
2191 (104) Health, Department of Public 1,037,546
2192 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2193 (1) State Agency Collections 13,000,000
2194 Total Personnel Department, State 13,000,000 13,000,000
Page 76

Total Personnel Department, State 13,000,000 13,000,000
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
2195 The above appropriations for the contract teams of the Department of Corrections and
2196 the Department of Public Health are for an estimated amount as agreed upon by the
2197 State Personnel Department and said departments for model work teams.
2198 98. Physical Therapy, Board of:
2199 (a) Professional and 858,335 858,335
2200 Occupational Licensing and
2201 Regulation Program
2202 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2203 (1) Physical Therapist Fund 858,335
2204 As provided in Section 34-24-195, Code of Alabama 1975.
2205 Total Physical Therapy, Board of 858,335 858,335
2206 99. Plumbers and Gas Fitters
2207 Examining Board:
2208 (a) Professional and 2,618,937 2,618,937
2209 Occupational Licensing and
2210 Regulation Program
2211 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2212 (1) Board of Plumbers and Gas 2,618,937
2213 Fitters Examiners Fund
2214 As provided in Section 34-37-5, Code of Alabama 1975.
2215 Total Plumbers and Gas Fitters 2,618,937 2,618,937
2216 Examining Board
2217 100. Podiatry Board, Alabama:
2218 (a) Professional and 120,000 120,000
2219 Occupational Licensing and
2220 Regulation Program
2221 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2222 (1) Podiatry Board 120,000
2223 Total Podiatry Board, Alabama 120,000 120,000
Page 77

Total Podiatry Board, Alabama 120,000 120,000
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
2224 101. Polygraph Examiners, Board
2225 of:
2226 (a) Professional and 40,000 40,000
2227 Occupational Licensing and
2228 Regulation Program
2229 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2230 (1) Board of Polygraph Examiners 40,000
2231 Fund
2232 As provided in Section 34-25-5, Code of Alabama 1975.
2233 Total Polygraph Examiners, Board 40,000 40,000
2234 of
2235 102. Private Investigation Board,
2236 Alabama:
2237 (a) Professional and 242,000 242,000
2238 Occupational Licensing and
2239 Regulation Program
2240 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2241 (1) Private Investigation Board 242,000
2242 Fund
2243 As provided in Section 34-25B-7, Code of Alabama 1975.
2244 Total Private Investigation Board, 242,000 242,000
2245 Alabama
2246 103. Prosecution Services, Office
2247 of:
2248 (a) Prosecution, Training, 1,778,736 2,600,000 4,378,736
2249 Education and Management
2250 Program
2251 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2252 (1) State General Fund 1,778,736
Page 78

(1) State General Fund 1,778,736
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
2253 (2) Office of Prosecution 2,000,000
2254 Services Fund
2255 (3) Victim Service Officer Funds 600,000
2256 Total Prosecution Services, Office 1,778,736 2,600,000 4,378,736
2257 of
2258 104. Prosthetists and Orthotists,
2259 Alabama State Board of:
2260 (a) Professional and 133,500 133,500
2261 Occupational Licensing and
2262 Regulation Program
2263 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2264 (1) State Board of Prosthetists 133,500
2265 and Orthotists Fund
2266 Total Prosthetists and Orthotists, 133,500 133,500
2267 Alabama State Board of
2268 In accordance with Sections 34-25A-1 through 34-25A-14, Code of Alabama 1975.
2269 105. Psychology, Alabama Board of
2270 Examiners in:
2271 (a) Professional and 619,862 619,862
2272 Occupational Licensing and
2273 Regulation Program
2274 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2275 (1) Board of Examiners in 619,862
2276 Psychology Fund
2277 As provided in Section 34-26-43, Code of Alabama 1975.
2278 Total Psychology, Alabama Board of 619,862 619,862
2279 Examiners in
2280 106. Public Service Commission:
2281 (a) Regulatory Services Program 22,607,121 22,607,121
Page 79

(a) Regulatory Services Program 22,607,121 22,607,121
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
2282 Notwithstanding any other laws to the contrary, the above appropriation
2283 includes a transfer to the State General Fund of $6,000,000 to be made in four
2284 equal amounts at the end of each quarter of the fiscal year.
2285 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2286 (1) Gas Pipeline Safety Fund 2,299,866
2287 (2) Public Service Commission 13,006,255
2288 Fund
2289 The above appropriation to the Alabama Public Service Commission shall be
2290 payable only from inspection and supervision fees paid by utilities, radio
2291 companies, transportation companies, and such parts or percentages of fees and
2292 taxes paid by motor carrier or motor transportation companies as are now or
2293 may be set aside by law to be used by the Commission.
2294 (3) Public Service Commission 6,000,000
2295 Fund - Transfer to the State
2296 General Fund
2297 (4) State Dual Party Relay Fund 1,301,000
2298 In accordance with Section 37-1-80.2, Code of Alabama 1975.
2299 Total Public Service Commission 22,607,121 22,607,121
2300 The Public Service Commission shall, from the funds appropriated above, pay the
2301 state's annual membership fees to the Southern States Energy Board for the calendar
2302 year 2027.
2303 107. Real Estate Appraisers Board,
2304 Alabama:
2305 (a) Professional and 1,539,693 1,539,693
2306 Occupational Licensing and
2307 Regulation Program
2308 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2309 (1) Real Estate Appraisers Board 1,539,693
2310 Fund
2311 In accordance with Sections 34-27A-1 through 34-27A-29, Code of Alabama 1975.
Page 80

In accordance with Sections 34-27A-1 through 34-27A-29, Code of Alabama 1975.
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
2312 Total Real Estate Appraisers 1,539,693 1,539,693
2313 Board, Alabama
2314 108. Real Estate Commission,
2315 Alabama:
2316 (a) Professional and 5,860,533 5,860,533
2317 Occupational Licensing and
2318 Regulation Program
2319 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2320 (1) Alabama Real Estate 200,000
2321 Commission - Recovery Fund
2322 (2) Alabama Real Estate 5,660,533
2323 Commission Fund
2324 As provided in Section 34-27-4, Code of Alabama 1975.
2325 Total Real Estate Commission, 5,860,533 5,860,533
2326 Alabama
2327 109. Respiratory Therapy, Alabama
2328 State Board of:
2329 (a) Professional and 350,000 350,000
2330 Occupational Licensing and
2331 Regulation Program
2332 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2333 (1) Respiratory Therapy Board 350,000
2334 Fund
2335 As provided in Sections 34-27B-1 through 34-27B-14, Code of Alabama 1975.
2336 Total Respiratory Therapy, Alabama 350,000 350,000
2337 State Board of
2338 110. Revenue, Department of:
2339 (a) State Revenue Administration 363,000 229,166,353 229,529,353
2340 Program
Page 81

363,000 229,166,353 229,529,353
Program
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
2341 Of the above appropriation to the Revenue Administration Program, the amount
2342 of $16,505,000 shall be transferred to the State General Fund in four equal
2343 payments at the beginning of each quarter of the fiscal year.
2344 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2345 (1) State General Fund - Board 113,000
2346 of Equalization
2347 (2) State General Fund - 250,000
2348 Transfer
2349 As provided in Section 40-7-70, Code of Alabama 1975, to maintain a program
2350 for the equalization of ad valorem assessments.
2351 (3) Contract Fees 528
2352 (4) Federal and Local Funds 24,224,671
2353 (5) Inspection fees for restored 1,537,577
2354 vehicles
2355 As provided in Section 32-8-87, Code of Alabama 1975.
2356 (6) Transfer from the gross 12,665,526
2357 proceeds of Gasoline Tax
2358 Collections
2359 (7) Transfer from the gross 381
2360 proceeds of Motor Carrier
2361 Mileage Tax Collections
2362 (8) Transfer from the gross 1,360,110
2363 proceeds of Motor Fuel Tax
2364 Collections
2365 (9) Transfer from the gross 330,712
2366 proceeds of Motor Vehicle
2367 License Collections
Page 82

330,712
License Collections
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
2368 (10) Transfer from the gross 2,644,002
2369 proceeds of Motor Vehicle
2370 License Collections for the
2371 purchase only of Motor
2372 Vehicle License Tags,
2373 Estimated
2374 (11) Transfer from the gross 127,795,552
2375 proceeds of Sales Tax
2376 Collections
2377 (12) Transfer from the gross 6,733
2378 proceeds of the Aviation
2379 Fuel Tax Collections
2380 (13) Transfer from the gross 250,000
2381 proceeds of the Construction
2382 Industry Fee Collections
2383 As provided in Sections 41-10-727 through 41-10-732, Code of Alabama 1975.
2384 (14) Transfer from the gross 36,839
2385 proceeds of the Contractors'
2386 Gross Receipts Privilege Tax
2387 Collections
2388 (15) Transfer from the gross 247,409
2389 proceeds of the Diesel Tax -
2390 Rebuild Alabama, ACT 2019-2,
2391 Collections
2392 (16) Transfer from the gross 50,000
2393 proceeds of the Drycleaning
2394 Environmental Fee
2395 Collections
Page 83

50,000
Collections
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
2396 (17) Transfer from the gross 37,000
2397 proceeds of the Electronic
2398 Nicotine Delivery Systems
2399 Tax Collections
2400 (18) Transfer from the gross 291,407
2401 proceeds of the Forest
2402 Severance Tax Collections
2403 (19) Transfer from the gross 744,926
2404 proceeds of the Gas Tax -
2405 Rebuild Alabama, ACT 2019-2,
2406 Collections
2407 (20) Transfer from the gross 91,471
2408 proceeds of the HB287 Tax
2409 Collections
2410 (21) Transfer from the gross 254
2411 proceeds of the
2412 Hydroelectric Privilege Tax
2413 Collections
2414 (22) Transfer from the gross 9,677
2415 proceeds of the IFTA Tax
2416 Collections
2417 (23) Transfer from the gross 12,957
2418 proceeds of the Lubricating
2419 Oil Excise Tax
2420 (24) Transfer from the gross 58,688
2421 proceeds of the Nursing
2422 Facility Privilege Tax
2423 Collections
Page 84

58,688
Collections
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
2424 (25) Transfer from the gross 165,774
2425 proceeds of the
2426 Pharmaceutical Services
2427 Privilege Tax Collections
2428 (26) Transfer from the gross 60,000
2429 proceeds of the Scrap Tire
2430 Environmental Fee
2431 Collections
2432 As provided in Section 22-40A-14, Code of Alabama 1975.
2433 (27) Transfer from the gross 485,509
2434 proceeds of the Store
2435 License Tax Collections
2436 (28) Transfer from the gross 440,921
2437 proceeds of the Tobacco Tax
2438 Collections
2439 (29) Transfer from the gross 312,621
2440 proceeds of the Utility Tax
2441 Collections
2442 (30) Transfer from the gross 3,986,074
2443 proceeds of Use Tax
2444 Collections
2445 (31) Transfer from the Income 44,035,642
2446 Tax Collections
2447 (32) Transfer from the Pension 1,820,848
2448 Fund as part of the cost of
2449 collections of the 1-Mill Ad
2450 Valorem Tax
2451 (33) Transfer from the Public 5,462,544
2452 School Fund as part of the
2453 cost of collections of the
2454 3-Mill Ad Valorem Tax
Page 85

5,462,544
3-Mill Ad Valorem Tax
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
2455 Total Revenue, Department of 363,000 229,166,353 229,529,353
2456 The amounts hereinabove appropriated for the cost of maintenance and operations of
2457 the Department of Revenue are in lieu of any other statutory provisions for the
2458 payment of the cost of operating said Department for collections of the taxes as
2459 authorized by law. Provided, however, in addition to the amount hereinabove
2460 appropriated, there is hereby appropriated to the Department of Revenue all sums
2461 allowed the Department of Revenue by acts of the Legislature as a charge for the
2462 collection of taxes or licenses. The Revenue Department shall not be limited in any
2463 way whatsoever in its ability to utilize or spend its full appropriation and all
2464 sums allowed to the Department of Revenue by acts of the Legislature as a charge for
2465 the collection of taxes or licenses. It is the intent of the Legislature that the
2466 Department of Revenue utilize the appropriations made to it in this act to: (1)
2467 significantly reduce the amount of delinquent taxes owed to the state; (2) employ
2468 sufficient examiners and audit personnel to ensure that taxes owed to the state are
2469 collected accurately and timely; and (3) update its personal computers and related
2470 equipment to become more efficient in the collection of taxes owed to the state.
2471 During Fiscal Year 2027, the Department shall report semi-annually to the Chairs of
2472 the House Ways and Means-General Fund Committee, Senate Finance and Taxation-General
2473 Fund Committee, and the Legislative Fiscal Officer on all actions taken by the
2474 Department in furtherance of these goals. The reports shall include, but not be
2475 limited to: (1) the number and amount of delinquent taxes collected during the
2476 quarter and the number and amounts of delinquent taxes outstanding as of the end of
2477 the quarter; (2) the number of additional examiners and audit personnel employed
2478 during the quarter (not including examiners and audit personnel employed to replace
2479 personnel that retire or otherwise leave state service); and (3) the number of new
2480 personal computers and related equipment put into use during the quarter.
2481 111. Secretary of State:
2482 (a) Administrative Support 12,386,000 12,386,000
2483 Services Program
2484 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2485 (1) Office of Voter Registration 200,000
Page 86

(1) Office of Voter Registration 200,000
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
2486 In accordance with Section 17-4-62, Code of Alabama 1975.
2487 (2) Corporations Fund, Estimated 3,619,500
2488 (3) Electronic Voting Fund 6,000
2489 (4) Farmers Credit Protection 63,000
2490 Fund
2491 In accordance with Section 7-9A-320, Code of Alabama 1975.
2492 (5) Federal Funds 6,000,000
2493 (6) Information Bulk Sales Fund 1,650,000
2494 In accordance with Section 7-9A-523, Code of Alabama 1975.
2495 (7) Uniform Commercial Code Fund 847,500
2496 Total Secretary of State 12,386,000 12,386,000
2497 112. Securities Commission:
2498 (a) Regulatory Services Program 21,642,145 21,642,145
2499 Notwithstanding any other laws to the contrary, the above appropriation
2500 includes a transfer to the State General Fund of $3,500,000 to be made in four
2501 equal amounts at the beginning of each quarter of the fiscal year.
2502 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2503 (1) Securities Commission Fund 18,142,145
2504 (2) Securities Commission Fund - 3,500,000
2505 Transfer to the State
2506 General Fund
2507 Total Securities Commission 21,642,145 21,642,145
2508 113. Security Regulatory Board,
2509 Alabama:
2510 (a) Licensing, Regulation and 950,000 950,000
2511 Enforcement Program
2512 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2513 (1) Security Certification Fund 950,000
2514 Total Security Regulatory Board, 950,000 950,000
2515 Alabama
Page 87

950,000 950,000
Alabama
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
2516 In accordance with Sections 34-27C-1, et seq., Code of Alabama 1975.
2517 114. Senior Services, Department
2518 of:
2519 (a) Planning and Advocacy for 17,125,096 44,010,123 61,135,219
2520 the Elderly Program
2521 (1) Elderly Nutrition Program 500,000
2522 (2) Ombudsman Program 500,000
2523 (3) Retired Senior Volunteer Program 357,580
2524 (4) Silver Haired Legislature 25,000
2525 (b) Medicaid Waiver Services 31,400,584 200,399,368 231,799,952
2526 Program
2527 (c) Elderly Medication Program 1,758,636 1,758,636
2528 The Alabama SenioRx program shall provide assistance obtaining prescription
2529 medications and shall be expanded to allow comprehensive benefits screening
2530 and application assistance through an Area Agency on Aging designated by the
2531 Department as an Aging and Disability Resource Center (ADRC). It is the intent
2532 of the Legislature that applicants apply through local Area Agencies on Aging
2533 and their provider networks to ensure services are maximized and that
2534 paperwork and inconvenience to the clients are minimized to receive access to
2535 local and public benefits and prescription assistance. The Department of
2536 Senior Services shall report semi-annually to the Chairs of the House Ways and
2537 Means-General Fund Committee and the Senate Finance and Taxation-General Fund
2538 Committee, the Governor, the Director of Finance, and the Legislative Fiscal
2539 Officer. The reports shall include the number of clients served by an ADRC,
2540 the number of unduplicated SenioRx participants, the number of prescriptions
2541 filled, and the estimated value of the drugs provided.
2542 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2543 (1) State General Fund 17,125,096
2544 (2) State General Fund - 31,400,584
2545 Medicaid Waiver
Page 88

31,400,584
Medicaid Waiver
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
2546 (3) State General Fund - 1,758,636
2547 Transfer - Alabama SeniorRx
2548 (4) Federal and Local Funds 244,409,491
2549 Total Senior Services, Department 50,284,316 244,409,491 294,693,807
2550 of
2551 In addition to the appropriations hereinabove made, there is hereby appropriated
2552 such amounts as become available from the Senior Services Trust Fund in accordance
2553 with Section 41-15C-1, Code of Alabama 1975, to the Department of Senior Services
2554 for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027.
2555 115. Social Work Examiners,
2556 Alabama State Board of:
2557 (a) Professional and 523,462 523,462
2558 Occupational Licensing and
2559 Regulation Program
2560 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2561 (1) Alabama State Board of 523,462
2562 Social Work Examiners Fund
2563 As provided in Section 34-30-6, Code of Alabama 1975.
2564 Total Social Work Examiners, 523,462 523,462
2565 Alabama State Board of
2566 116. Soil and Water Conservation
2567 Committee, State:
2568 (a) Water Resource Development 3,817,915 50,000,000 53,817,915
2569 Program
2570 (1) Regional Conservation Partnership 81,403
2571 Program (RCPP) State Match
2572 (b) Professional and 6,000 6,000
2573 Occupational Licensing and
2574 Regulation Program
2575 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
Page 89

SOURCE OF FUNDS:
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
2576 (1) State General Fund 3,817,915
2577 (2) Departmental Receipts 50,000,000
2578 (3) Soil Classifiers Fund 6,000
2579 As provided in Section 34-32-19, Code of Alabama 1975.
2580 Total Soil and Water Conservation 3,817,915 50,006,000 53,823,915
2581 Committee, State
2582 117. Speech Pathology and
2583 Audiology, Alabama Board of
2584 Examiners for:
2585 (a) Professional and 342,000 342,000
2586 Occupational Licensing and
2587 Regulation Program
2588 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2589 (1) Alabama Board of Examiners 342,000
2590 for Speech Pathology and
2591 Audiology Fund
2592 As provided in Section 34-28A-44, Code of Alabama 1975.
2593 Total Speech Pathology and 342,000 342,000
2594 Audiology, Alabama Board of
2595 Examiners for
2596 118. Surface Mining Commission,
2597 Alabama:
2598 (a) Industrial Safety and 1,018,860 10,493,863 11,512,723
2599 Accident Prevention Program
2600 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2601 (1) State General Fund - 1,018,860
2602 Transfer
2603 (2) Bond Forfeiture/Reclamation 7,000,000
2604 Projects, Estimated
2605 As provided in Section 9-16-103, Code of Alabama 1975.
Page 90

As provided in Section 9-16-103, Code of Alabama 1975.
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
2606 (3) Federal and Local Funds 2,060,638
2607 (4) Surface Mining Commission - 1,433,225
2608 Fees
2609 Total Surface Mining Commission, 1,018,860 10,493,863 11,512,723
2610 Alabama
2611 119. Tax Tribunal, Alabama:
2612 (a) Administrative Services 1,169,479 1,169,479
2613 Program
2614 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2615 (1) Alabama Tax Tribunal Fund 1,169,479
2616 Total Tax Tribunal, Alabama 1,169,479 1,169,479
2617 120. Tennessee-Tombigbee Waterway
2618 Development Authority:
2619 (a) Water Resource Development 150,000 150,000
2620 Program
2621 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2622 (1) State General Fund 150,000
2623 Total Tennessee-Tombigbee Waterway 150,000 150,000
2624 Development Authority
2625 121. Tourism Department, Alabama:
2626 (a) Tourism and Travel Promotion 5,436,889 31,740,450 37,177,339
2627 Program
2628 (1) Alabama Bass Trail 224,437
2629 (2) Alabama Scenic River Trail 400,000
2630 (3) Alabama Sports Festival 275,000
2631 (4) Indy Grand Prix of Alabama 500,000
2632 (5) Birmingham Civil Rights Museum 300,000
2633 (6) Blackbelt Adventures 525,000
2634 (7) Buckmasters 300,000
2635 (8) Dothan Area Botanical Gardens 50,000
Page 91

(8) Dothan Area Botanical Gardens 50,000
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
2636 (9) Freshwater Land Trust 225,000
2637 (10) Local and State Economy Tourism 3,000,000
2638 Grants
2639 (11) Magic City Classic 350,000
2640 (12) Motor Sports Hall of Fame 250,000
2641 (13) Regions Tradition Golf Tournament 100,000
2642 (14) Talladega Superspeedway 500,000
2643 For security expenses.
2644 (15) Talladega Superspeedway 500,000
2645 For tourism generally.
2646 (16) SEC Baseball Tournament 75,000
2647 (17) USS Alabama Battleship 750,000
2648 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2649 (1) State General Fund 5,436,889
2650 (2) Lodging Tax ($0.01) 31,740,450
2651 Receipts collected under the provisions of Sections 40-26-1, et seq., Code of
2652 Alabama 1975.
2653 Total Tourism Department, Alabama 5,436,889 31,740,450 37,177,339
2654 122. Transportation, Department
2655 of:
2656 (a) Surface Transportation 1,620,856,019 1,620,856,019
2657 Improvement and Preservation
2658 Program
2659 Proposed spending plan for the above (a) includes the following: Industrial
2660 Access Improvements & Assistance: 11,000,000
2661 (b) General Administration 188,201,823 188,201,823
2662 Program
2663 Proposed spending plan for the above (b) includes the following: Captive
2664 County Health Insurance: 75,000
Page 92

County Health Insurance: 75,000
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
2665 (c) General Aviation and 70,000,000 70,000,000
2666 Aeronautic Improvement and
2667 Assistance Program
2668 (d) Rebuild Alabama Program 683,000,000 683,000,000
2669 (e) Electronic Transportation 1,200,000 1,200,000
2670 Infrastructure Grant Program
2671 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2672 (1) Federal Aid 1,254,057,842
2673 (2) Public Road and Bridge Fund 555,000,000
Page 93

(2) Public Road and Bridge Fund 555,000,000
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
2674 There is hereby appropriated for payment of the principal of and the interest
2675 on all bonds heretofore or hereafter issued for public highways and bridge
2676 purposes, or either, by the State of Alabama, Alabama Federal Aid Highway
2677 Finance Authority, Alabama Highway Finance Corporation, Alabama Industrial
2678 Access Road and Bridge Corporation, or Alabama Highway Authority a total of
2679 $192,993,061 or so much thereof as may be necessary for payment of said
2680 principal and interest at their respective maturities, of the revenues pledged
2681 for such payment. There is also hereby appropriated an amount not to exceed
2682 $25,000,000 as an annual contribution to the Alabama Transportation
2683 Infrastructure Bank, if needed, for payment of debt service. The Director of
2684 Transportation, with the consent of the Governor and the Director of Finance,
2685 shall have the authority to transfer any appropriation or any portion thereof
2686 between and among subdivisions (a), (b) and (c) of this section whenever such
2687 transfer shall be necessary to assure maximum utilization of federal matching
2688 funds which shall become available. In the event that there shall not be
2689 sufficient funds available for payment of all appropriations hereinabove made,
2690 the following provisions shall be applicable. In the event of such
2691 insufficiency in respect of said revenues accruing to the Department of
2692 Transportation: (1) the appropriation made for Debt Service in subdivisions
2693 (a) and (b) hereof shall be paid in full, and (2) the appropriations from the
2694 revenues accruing to the Department of Transportation that are herein made for
2695 the purposes referred to in subdivisions (a), (b) and (c) except for Debt
2696 Service, hereof shall be allocated among the purposes referred to in said
2697 subdivisions in such order and with such priorities as the Director of the
2698 Department of Transportation shall from time to time direct. The funds
2699 appropriated in subdivisions (a) and (c) hereof, for the matching federal
2700 funds, shall not revert at the end of the fiscal year for which such
2701 appropriations are made but shall remain available for the purposes for which
2702 such appropriations were made. In addition to all appropriations hereinabove
2703 made, there is hereby appropriated to the Department of Transportation all
2704 federal funds accruing thereto to be expended only for the purpose for which
2705 such funds are made available.
Page 94

such funds are made available.
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
2706 (3) Federal Grants - Aeronautics 70,000,000
2707 (4) Rebuild Alabama Fund 684,200,000
2708 Total Transportation, Department 2,563,257,842 2,563,257,842
2709 of
2710 In addition to the above appropriation, there is hereby appropriated to the
2711 Department of Transportation such amounts as may be received by the Department for
2712 resolution of Civil Action No. 85-T-655-N.
2713 123. Treasurer, State:
2714 (a) Fiscal Management Program 6,440,062 6,440,062
2715 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2716 (1) Alabama College Education 443,257
2717 Savings Administrative Fund
2718 As provided in Section 16-33C-10, Code of Alabama 1975.
2719 (2) Prepaid Affordable College 478,201
2720 Tuition Fund
2721 (3) Safe Program Enforcement 2,500
2722 Fund
2723 (4) State Treasury Operations 5,516,104
2724 Fund
2725 As provided in Section 36-17-20, Code of Alabama 1975.
2726 Total Treasurer, State 6,440,062 6,440,062
2727 124. Underground and Aboveground
2728 Storage Tank Trust Fund
2729 Management Board, Alabama:
2730 (a) Administration of 150,000 150,000
2731 Underground and Aboveground
2732 Storage Tank Trust Fund
2733 Management Board Program
2734 (1) Continuing Education and Training 150,000
2735 Program
Page 95

150,000
Program
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
2736 This amount may be used for a continuing education and training program related to storage tank
2737 release prevention and clean up. Such continuing education shall be provided by a qualified
2738 program approved by the Underground and Aboveground Storage Tank Trust Fund Management Board.
2739 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2740 (1) Underground and Aboveground 150,000
2741 Storage Tank Trust Fund
2742 As provided in Section 22-35-4, Code of Alabama 1975.
2743 Total Underground and Aboveground 150,000 150,000
2744 Storage Tank Trust Fund Management
2745 Board, Alabama
2746 125. Underground Damage Prevention
2747 Authority:
2748 (a) Underground Damage 101,946 101,946
2749 Prevention Authority Program
2750 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2751 (1) Underground Damage 101,946
2752 Prevention Authority Fund
2753 Total Underground Damage 101,946 101,946
2754 Prevention Authority
2755 126. Veterans Affairs, Department
2756 of:
2757 (a) Administration of Veterans 3,839,157 11,628,009 15,467,166
2758 Affairs Program
2759 (1) Department of Alabama Disabled 113,400
2760 American Veterans
2761 a. Women's Auxiliary 5,000
2762 (2) Still Serving Veterans 70,000
2763 (3) Suicide Prevention 300,000
2764 To support efforts to prevent suicide among service members, veterans, and their families.
2765 (4) Lakeshore Foundation Support Our 550,000
2766 Veterans Program
Page 96

550,000
Veterans Program
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
2767 (b) Veterans Homes 164,276,050 164,276,050
2768 Administration Program
2769 (c) Capital Outlay Program 9,987,580 9,987,580
2770 (d) Veterans Cemetery Program 1,247,568 1,247,568
2771 (e) Veterans Grant Program 7,000,000 7,000,000
2772 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2773 (1) State General Fund 3,839,157
2774 (2) Veterans' Assistance Fund 101,742,780
2775 The appropriation from the Veterans' Assistance Fund may be expended for
2776 operation of the Veterans' Nursing Homes, any other direct expenditure for
2777 veterans' services, and capital outlay.
2778 (3) Veterans' Home Trust Fund - 92,396,427
2779 Transfer
2780 Total Veterans Affairs, Department 3,839,157 194,139,207 197,978,364
2781 of
2782 127. Veterinary Medical Examiners,
2783 Alabama State Board of:
2784 (a) Professional and 786,989 786,989
2785 Occupational Licensing and
2786 Regulation Program
2787 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2788 (1) State Board of Veterinary 786,989
2789 Medical Examiners Fund
2790 As provided in Section 34-29-70, Code of Alabama 1975.
2791 Total Veterinary Medical 786,989 786,989
2792 Examiners, Alabama State Board of
2793 128. Women's Commission, Alabama:
2794 (a) Employment and Social 35,000 35,000
2795 Opportunities Program
2796 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
Page 97

SOURCE OF FUNDS:
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
2797 (1) Women's Commission Fund 35,000
2798 Total Women's Commission, Alabama 35,000 35,000
2799 129. Workforce, Alabama Department
2800 of :
2801 (a) Regulatory Services Program 3,165,168 3,165,168
2802 (b) Administrative Services 150,000 26,621,770 26,771,770
2803 Program
2804 (c) Employment Security Program 66,214,349 66,214,349
2805 (d) Industrial Safety and 1,256,298 51,176,791 52,433,089
2806 Accident Prevention Program
2807 (1) Mine Safety Inspection Program 350,000
2808 (e) Regulation Workers' 6,752,993 6,752,993
2809 Compensation Program
2810 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2811 (1) State General Fund 1,406,298
2812 (2) Boiler and Pressure Vessel 1,454,259
2813 Inspection Fee Receipts
2814 As provided in Section 25-12-18, Code of Alabama 1975.
2815 (3) Child Labor Fund 169,553
2816 (4) Elevator Safety Review Fee 1,957,338
2817 Receipts
2818 As provided in Section 25-13-6, Code of Alabama 1975.
2819 (5) Employment Security 6,817,156
2820 Administration Fund
2821 (6) Federal and Local Funds 85,832,981
2822 (7) Federal Funds: Abandoned 26,352,761
2823 Mine Land
2824 (8) Federal Funds: Abandoned 21,000,000
2825 Mine Land - BILF
Page 98

21,000,000
Mine Land - BILF
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
2826 (9) State Abandoned Mine Land 3,594,030
2827 Reclamation Fund
2828 (10) Professional Employer 396,110
2829 Organization Registration
2830 Fund
2831 (11) Workers Compensation 6,356,883
2832 Administration Trust Fund
2833 Total Workforce, Alabama 1,406,298 153,931,071 155,337,369
2834 Department of
2835 130. Youth Services, Department
2836 of:
2837 (a) Financial Assistance Program 716,795 716,795
2838 (School District)
2839 (b) Youth Services Program 7,375,805 31,717,887 39,093,692
2840 (1) Juvenile Corrections 300,000
2841 (c) Diversion Program 1,000,000 1,000,000
2842 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2843 (1) State General Fund - 8,375,805
2844 Transfer
2845 (2) Youth Services Fund 32,434,682
2846 Total Youth Services, Department 8,375,805 32,434,682 40,810,487
2847 of
2848 It is the intent of the Legislature that the Department notify the members of each
2849 local legislative delegation (whenever possible) prior to grants being awarded in
2850 each legislative district. The Department shall notify the legislative delegation of
2851 the amount of the grant, the recipient of the grant, and the date the grant is to be
2852 awarded. Any appropriation expended for youth detention facilities shall be
2853 allocated as follows: Part I - each detention facility will receive $14,000 for each
2854 county the detention facility serves. Part II - the balance of such funds shall be
2855 allocated based upon the population of the county or counties served by the
2856 detention facility (statewide among 12 detention facilities).
Page 99

detention facility (statewide among 12 detention facilities).
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
2857 D. Other:
2858 1. Arrest of Absconding Felons:
2859 (a) Criminal Investigation 24,735 24,735
2860 Program, Estimated
2861 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2862 (1) State General Fund 24,735
2863 As provided in Sections 15-9-1 and 15-9-3, Code of Alabama 1975.
2864 Total Arrest of Absconding Felons 24,735 24,735
2865 2. Automatic Appeal Expense:
2866 (a) Legal Advice and Legal 33 33
2867 Services Program, Estimated
2868 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2869 (1) State General Fund 33
2870 As provided in Sections 12-22-150 and 12-22-241, Code of Alabama 1975.
2871 Total Automatic Appeal Expense 33 33
2872 3. Correctional Facilities
2873 Maintenance Fund:
2874 (a) Correctional Facilities 1,835,000 1,835,000
2875 Maintenance Fund Program
2876 Established in Section 14-2-21(d), Code of Alabama 1975.
2877 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2878 (1) State General Fund 1,835,000
2879 Total Correctional Facilities 1,835,000 1,835,000
2880 Maintenance Fund
2881 4. County Government Capital
2882 Improvement Fund:
2883 (a) Special Services Program, 28,842,093 28,842,093
2884 Estimated
2885 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
Page 100

SOURCE OF FUNDS:
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
2886 (1) Alabama Trust Fund Income, 28,842,093
2887 Estimated
2888 Total County Government Capital 28,842,093 28,842,093
2889 Improvement Fund
2890 5. Court Assessed Costs Not
2891 Provided For:
2892 (a) Special Services Program, 5,500,000 5,500,000
2893 Estimated
2894 As provided in Sections 22-52-14, 22-11A-1 through 22-11A-41, 12-15-215,
2895 26-17-636 and 12-21-131, Code of Alabama 1975.
2896 (b) Legal Advice and Legal 264,500 264,500
2897 Services Program
2898 It is the intent of the Legislature that the appropriation in this subsection
2899 be expended for court costs, which include cost of depositions, witness fees
2900 and expenses, filing and docket fees, court reporters, court judgments,
2901 attorneys fees, out-of-court settlements, and other expenses ordered by the
2902 court or normally identified as costs of court, when any of the above is
2903 approved by the Attorney General. The Attorney General shall provide a report
2904 semi-annually to the Chair of the House Ways and Means-General Fund Committee,
2905 the Chair of the Senate Finance and Taxation-General Fund Committee, and the
2906 Legislative Fiscal Officer on the detailed expenditures of this appropriation.
2907 (c) Automatic Appeal Cases 15,630 15,630
2908 Expense Program
2909 The above appropriation shall be used to reimburse reasonable expenses
2910 incurred by attorneys representing defendants under sentence of death in state
2911 collateral proceedings, such as those under Rule 32 of the Rules of Criminal
2912 Procedure. Provided, in no case may any amount be paid unless the court
2913 determines by written order in advance that the cost is both necessary and
2914 reasonable; and in no event may any amount be paid out of this appropriation
2915 as fees to any attorney for services or to compensate any attorney for time
2916 either as an attorney in the proceeding or as a witness.
Page 101

either as an attorney in the proceeding or as a witness.
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
2917 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2918 (1) State General Fund 264,500
2919 (2) State General Fund, 5,500,000
2920 Estimated
2921 (3) State General Fund - 15,630
2922 Automatic Appeal Cases
2923 Total Court Assessed Costs Not 5,780,130 5,780,130
2924 Provided For
2925 6. Court Costs:
2926 (a) Court Operations Program, 81 81
2927 Estimated
2928 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2929 (1) State General Fund 81
2930 Pursuant to Act No. 558, 1957, Page 777.
2931 Total Court Costs 81 81
2932 7. Distribution of Public
2933 Documents:
2934 (a) Administrative Support 483,000 483,000
2935 Services Program, Estimated
2936 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2937 (1) State General Fund 483,000
2938 As provided in Sections 36-14-1, 36-14-11, 17-5-11, and 41-21-8, Code of
2939 Alabama 1975.
2940 Total Distribution of Public 483,000 483,000
2941 Documents
2942 8. Election Expenses:
2943 (a) Special Services Program, 9,476,500 9,476,500
2944 Estimated
2945 (b) Training of Election 32,849 32,849
2946 Officials
Page 102

32,849 32,849
Officials
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
2947 For payment of expenses pursuant to the court order entered by the U.S.
2948 District Court, Middle District of Alabama in Civil Action No. 84-T-595-N.
2949 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2950 (1) State General Fund 32,849
2951 (2) State General Fund, 9,476,500
2952 Estimated
2953 Total Election Expenses 9,509,349 9,509,349
2954 As provided in Section 17-16-7, Code of Alabama 1975.
2955 9. Emergency Fund, Departmental:
2956 (a) Special Services Program 6,807,038 6,807,038
2957 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2958 (1) State General Fund 6,807,038
2959 Total Emergency Fund, Departmental 6,807,038 6,807,038
2960 This is the appropriation contemplated in Section 41-4-94, Code of Alabama 1975, and
2961 shall be the only amount appropriated and the total amount expended under the
2962 provisions of said section. This appropriation shall be expended solely for the
2963 purpose of addressing a financial emergency within a state department, board,
2964 commission, bureau, office, or agency. At least ten days prior to the release of any
2965 of this appropriation to any state department, board, commission, bureau, office, or
2966 agency, the Director of Finance shall notify the Chair of the Senate Finance and
2967 Taxation-General Fund Committee, the Chair of the House Ways and Means-General Fund
2968 Committee, and the Legislative Fiscal Officer of such pending transfer.
2969 10. Emergency Prisoner Feeding
2970 Fund:
2971 (a) Institutional Services - 750,000 750,000
2972 Corrections Program,
2973 Estimated
2974 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2975 (1) State General Fund - 750,000
2976 Transfer
Page 103

750,000
Transfer
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
2977 Total Emergency Prisoner Feeding 750,000 750,000
2978 Fund
2979 11. Fair Trial Tax Transfer:
2980 (a) Court Operations Program, 85,692,909 85,692,909
2981 Estimated
2982 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2983 (1) State General Fund - 85,692,909
2984 Transfer
2985 Total Fair Trial Tax Transfer 85,692,909 85,692,909
2986 12. Feeding of Prisoners:
2987 (a) Institutional Services - 15,300,000 15,300,000
2988 Corrections Program,
2989 Estimated
2990 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2991 (1) State General Fund 15,300,000
2992 For expenses of feeding prisoners in county jails in accordance with Sections
2993 14-6-42 and 14-6-47, Code of Alabama 1975.
2994 Total Feeding of Prisoners 15,300,000 15,300,000
2995 13. Finance - CMIA, Department of:
2996 (a) Fiscal Management Program, 120,000 120,000
2997 Estimated
2998 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2999 (1) State General Fund 120,000
3000 As provided in Section 41-4-38, Code of Alabama 1975.
3001 Total Finance - CMIA, Department 120,000 120,000
3002 of
3003 14. Finance - FEMA, Department of:
3004 (a) Readiness and Recovery 5,760,099 5,760,099
3005 Program, Estimated
Page 104

5,760,099 5,760,099
Program, Estimated
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
3006 For payment of the State's share of administrative costs and matching grants
3007 furnished by the Federal Emergency Management Agency.
3008 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
3009 (1) State General Fund 5,760,099
3010 Total Finance - FEMA, Department 5,760,099 5,760,099
3011 of
3012 The above appropriation to the Department of Finance - FEMA from the State General
3013 Fund is conditioned upon the declaration of a man made, technological, biological,
3014 or natural disaster area by the President of the United States and conditioned
3015 further upon the requirement by the Federal Emergency Management Agency for the
3016 State of Alabama to pay a state match for FEMA grants.
3017 15. Finance - Special Funds :
3018 (a) Financial Assistance Program 34,000,000 34,000,000
3019 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
3020 (1) ARPA - State Small Business 34,000,000
3021 Credit Initiative Fund,
3022 Estimated
3023 Total Finance - Special Funds 34,000,000 34,000,000
3024 16. Forest Fire Fund, Emergency:
3025 (a) Forest Resources Protection 250,000 250,000
3026 and Development Program
3027 The appropriation to the Emergency Forest Fire Fund shall be conditioned as
3028 provided in Section 9-3-10.1, Code of Alabama 1975.
3029 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
3030 (1) State General Fund - 250,000
3031 Transfer
3032 The appropriation to the Emergency Forest Fire Fund shall be conditioned as
3033 provided by Section 9-3-10.1, Code of Alabama 1975.
3034 Total Forest Fire Fund, Emergency 250,000 250,000
Page 105

Total Forest Fire Fund, Emergency 250,000 250,000
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
3035 17. Governor's Conference,
3036 National:
3037 (a) Executive Direction Program, 156,624 156,624
3038 Estimated
3039 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
3040 (1) State General Fund 156,624
3041 Total Governor's Conference, 156,624 156,624
3042 National
3043 18. Governor's Proclamation
3044 Expenses:
3045 (a) Executive Direction Program, 236,250 236,250
3046 Estimated
3047 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
3048 (1) State General Fund 236,250
3049 As provided in Sections 17-12-18 and 17-14-53, Code of Alabama 1975.
3050 Total Governor's Proclamation 236,250 236,250
3051 Expenses
3052 19. Governor's Widow Retirement:
3053 (a) Executive Direction Program, 6,048 6,048
3054 Estimated
3055 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
3056 (1) State General Fund 6,048
3057 As provided in Section 36-13-12, Code of Alabama 1975.
3058 Total Governor's Widow Retirement 6,048 6,048
3059 20. Law Enforcement Agency,
3060 Alabama-Emergency Code:
3061 (a) Readiness and Recovery 56,700 56,700
3062 Program
3063 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
Page 106

SOURCE OF FUNDS:
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
3064 (1) State General Fund - 56,700
3065 Transfer
3066 Total Law Enforcement Agency, 56,700 56,700
3067 Alabama-Emergency Code
3068 21. Law Enforcement Agency,
3069 Alabama-State Bureau of
3070 Investigation Cost of Evidence
3071 Fund:
3072 (a) Special Services Program 118,125 118,125
3073 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
3074 (1) State General Fund - 118,125
3075 Transfer
3076 Total Law Enforcement Agency, 118,125 118,125
3077 Alabama-State Bureau of
3078 Investigation Cost of Evidence
3079 Fund
3080 The above appropriation to the Alabama Law Enforcement Agency SBI Cost of Evidence
3081 Fund shall be conditioned as provided in Section 32-2-11, Code of Alabama 1975, and
3082 shall remain in the State General Fund until a demonstrated need is determined and
3083 recommended by the Director of Finance and approved by the Governor.
3084 22. Law Enforcement Fund:
3085 (a) Criminal Investigation 10,000 10,000
3086 Program, Estimated
3087 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
3088 (1) State General Fund 10,000
3089 Total Law Enforcement Fund 10,000 10,000
3090 23. Law Enforcement Legal Defense:
3091 (a) Legal Advice and Legal 819 819
3092 Services Program, Estimated
3093 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
Page 107

SOURCE OF FUNDS:
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
3094 (1) State General Fund 819
3095 To carry out provisions of Section 36-21-1, Code of Alabama 1975.
3096 Total Law Enforcement Legal 819 819
3097 Defense
3098 24. Military - Emergency Active
3099 Duty Pay:
3100 (a) Military Operations Program, 1,394,000 1,394,000
3101 Estimated
3102 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
3103 (1) State General Fund 1,394,000
3104 As provided in Section 31-2-133, Code of Alabama 1975.
3105 Total Military - Emergency Active 1,394,000 1,394,000
3106 Duty Pay
3107 25. Municipal Government Capital
3108 Improvement Fund:
3109 (a) Special Services Program, 28,842,093 28,842,093
3110 Estimated
3111 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
3112 (1) Alabama Trust Fund Income, 28,842,093
3113 Estimated
3114 Total Municipal Government Capital 28,842,093 28,842,093
3115 Improvement Fund
3116 26. Port Authority Transfer,
3117 Alabama State:
3118 (a) State Port Authority Program 3,500,000 3,500,000
3119 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
3120 (1) State General Fund 3,500,000
Page 108

(1) State General Fund 3,500,000
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
3121 The above appropriation to the Alabama State Port Authority shall be
3122 conditioned upon the availability of funds and shall remain in the State
3123 General Fund until a demonstrated need is determined and recommended by the
3124 Director of Finance and approved by the Governor.
3125 Total Port Authority Transfer, 3,500,000 3,500,000
3126 Alabama State
3127 27. Printing of Codes and
3128 Supplements - Secretary of
3129 State:
3130 (a) Administrative Support 250,000 250,000
3131 Services Program, Estimated
3132 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
3133 (1) State General Fund 250,000
3134 As provided in Sections 41-21-1 through 41-21-8, Code of Alabama 1975.
3135 Total Printing of Codes and 250,000 250,000
3136 Supplements - Secretary of State
3137 It is the intent of the Legislature that the number of Codes and Supplements printed
3138 and distributed shall be limited to the minimum number actually needed, utilized,
3139 and required by law. Procedures should be adopted to verify the need and utility of
3140 required printed sets to ensure printing cost savings when possible.
3141 28. Printing of Legislative Acts
3142 and Journals:
3143 (a) Administrative Support 50,000 50,000
3144 Services Program, Estimated
3145 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
3146 (1) State General Fund 50,000
3147 Total Printing of Legislative Acts 50,000 50,000
3148 and Journals
3149 29. Registration of Voters - Photo
3150 Voter Identification:
Page 109

Voter Identification:
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
3151 (a) Special Services Program, 304,000 304,000
3152 Estimated
3153 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
3154 (1) State General Fund 304,000
3155 In accordance with Section 17-9-30, Code of Alabama 1975.
3156 Total Registration of Voters - 304,000 304,000
3157 Photo Voter Identification
3158 All expenses from the above appropriation shall be reported by the Secretary of
3159 State to the Chairs of the House Ways and Means-General Fund Committee and the
3160 Senate Finance and Taxation-General Fund Committee at least semi-annually for fiscal
3161 year 2027.
3162 30. Registration of Voters - Voter
3163 Registrars:
3164 (a) Special Services Program, 4,680,000 4,680,000
3165 Estimated
3166 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
3167 (1) State General Fund 4,680,000
3168 In accordance with Sections 17-3-5 and 17-3-57, Code of Alabama 1975.
3169 Total Registration of Voters - 4,680,000 4,680,000
3170 Voter Registrars
3171 31. Removal of Prisoners:
3172 (a) Administrative Services and 1,100,000 1,100,000
3173 Logistical Support Program,
3174 Estimated
3175 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
3176 (1) State General Fund 1,100,000
3177 As provided in Sections 15-10-70 through 15-10-73, 15-9-62, 15-9-65, and
3178 15-9-81, Code of Alabama 1975.
3179 Total Removal of Prisoners 1,100,000 1,100,000
Page 110

Total Removal of Prisoners 1,100,000 1,100,000
HB218 INTRODUCED
State General
Fund Other Funds Total
3180 32. Sheriff's Advancement in
3181 Education, Technology, and
3182 Training Fund:
3183 (a) Special Services Program 5,000,000 5,000,000
3184 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
3185 (1) State General Fund - 5,000,000
3186 Transfer
3187 Total Sheriff's Advancement in 5,000,000 5,000,000
3188 Education, Technology, and
3189 Training Fund
3190 33. Grimes, Dan:
3191 (a) Special Services Program 50,000 50,000
3192 To pay the award by the Committee on Compensation for Wrongful Incarceration
3193 for the wrongful incarceration of Dan Grimes.
3194 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
3195 (1) State General Fund 50,000
3196 Total Grimes, Dan 50,000 50,000
3197 34. Dandridge, Beniah:
3198 (a) Special Services Program 50,000 50,000
3199 To pay the award by the Committee on Compensation for Wrongful Incarceration
3200 for the wrongful incarceration of Beniah Dandridge.
3201 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
3202 (1) State General Fund 50,000
3203 Total Dandridge, Beniah 50,000 50,000
3204
Page 111

HB218 INTRODUCED
3205
3206 Section 4. In addition to the amounts otherwise
3207 appropriated in this act, there is hereby appropriated from
3208 the several funds in the State Treasury, except the Education
3209 Trust Fund, and in the same proportion as the salaries of the
3210 several State officials and employees are paid, such
3211 additional amounts as may be necessary to pay for a two
3212 percent (2%) salary increase enacted in the 2026 Regular
3213 Session. The additional amounts appropriated in this section
3214 from the State General Fund shall not exceed $16,000,000 for
3215 the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027. The Director of
3216 Finance shall ensure that first priority shall be given to all
3217 State General Fund payrolls, including the payroll of the
3218 Legislature. State agencies shall receive additional
3219 allocations from the appropriation made in this section from
3220 the State General Fund in amounts necessary to increase total
3221 salaries paid from the State General Fund by two percent. The
3222 remainder of this appropriation from the State General Fund
3223 may be allotted by the Director of Finance to those agencies
3224 which receive transfers from the State General Fund.
3225 Section 5. The State General Fund appropriations in
3226 this act anticipate a beginning balance in the State General
3227 Fund for fiscal year 2027, excluding reversions and
3228 adjustments, of $291,543,843.
3229 Section 6. Notwithstanding any other provisions of
3230 this act or any other act, any amounts from appropriations for
3231 the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026, to the various
Page 112

the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026, to the various
HB218 INTRODUCED
3232 state agencies in this act which were unexpended and reverted
3233 on September 30, 2026, are hereby reappropriated to the
3234 respective offices for the fiscal year beginning October 1,
3235 2026.
3236 Section 7. In addition to all other appropriations
3237 heretofore or hereafter made, there is hereby appropriated
3238 such amounts as may be necessary for the fiscal year ending
3239 September 30, 2027, to the Retirement Systems of Alabama from
3240 the Senior Services Trust Fund to comply with Section
3241 41-15C-1, Code of Alabama 1975.
3242 Section 8. In addition to all other appropriations
3243 heretofore and hereafter made, there is hereby appropriated
3244 such amounts as may be necessary for public funds transferred
3245 into the State Treasury, in accordance with Executive Order
3246 No. 726.
3247 Section 9. In addition to all other appropriations
3248 heretofore or hereafter made, there is hereby conditionally
3249 appropriated any and all amounts from tobacco settlement or
3250 litigation for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027. The
3251 amounts are conditioned upon the State of Alabama receiving
3252 revenue from tobacco settlement or litigation and upon the
3253 recommendation of the Director of Finance, the Chairs of the
3254 House Ways and Means-General Fund Committee and the Senate
3255 Finance and Taxation-General Fund Committee, and the approval
3256 of the Governor. The conditional appropriation made herein
3257 shall be allocated pursuant to Sections 41-10-620 through
3258 41-10-639 and Sections 41-15B-1 through 41-15B-8, Code of
Page 113

41-10-639 and Sections 41-15B-1 through 41-15B-8, Code of
HB218 INTRODUCED
3259 Alabama 1975.
3260 Section 10. Except as may be herein otherwise
3261 provided, amounts herein specifically appropriated shall be in
3262 lieu of the amounts heretofore provided or appropriated by law
3263 for such purposes. The amounts herein appropriated are the
3264 maximum amounts to be expended for the purposes herein
3265 designated and in no event shall the maximum expenditure
3266 provided for any items of expense exceed the amount allocated
3267 herein except as may be further provided for under this act,
3268 as provided in the Budget Management Act of 1976, Sections
3269 41-19-1, et seq., Code of Alabama 1975, and those
3270 appropriations herein made, except appropriations to the
3271 Alabama Alcoholic Beverage Control Board for the purchase of
3272 alcoholic beverages, are and shall be subject to the terms,
3273 conditions, provisions and limitations of Sections 41-4-80, et
3274 seq., Code of Alabama 1975, and the Budget Management Act of
3275 1976, Sections 41-19-1, et seq., Code of Alabama 1975.
3276 Section 11. Any surplus remaining in any appropriation
3277 herein made from the State General Fund to any office,
3278 department, bureau, board, commission, or agency may be
3279 transferred, on order of the Governor, to any other
3280 appropriation herein made from the State General Fund when
3281 such appropriation to any office, department, bureau, board,
3282 commission, or agency is insufficient to pay salaries in that
3283 office, department, bureau, board, commission, or agency.
3284 Section 12. (a) In addition to appropriations herein
3285 made, all gifts, grants, insurance proceeds, contributions, or
Page 114

made, all gifts, grants, insurance proceeds, contributions, or
HB218 INTRODUCED
3286 entitlements, in excess of the amount carried in this act,
3287 including grants by the Congress of the United States,
3288 municipalities, or counties, to any department, division,
3289 board, bureau, commission, agency, institution, office, or
3290 officer of the State of Alabama are hereby appropriated and,
3291 in the event the same are recurring, are reappropriated to
3292 such department, division, board, bureau, commission, agency,
3293 institution, office, or officer to be used only for the
3294 purpose or purposes for which the grant or contribution was or
3295 shall be made. Further, all state, county, municipal, and
3296 educational entities are authorized to disburse such sums as
3297 deemed necessary by mutual agreement among said entities, the
3298 State of Alabama, and the Department of Examiners of Public
3299 Accounts to partially defray the cost of auditing services
3300 performed by said agency. All such sums are hereby
3301 appropriated and reappropriated if necessary to the Department
3302 of Examiners of Public Accounts for audit services, to be
3303 expended through the fund established by Section 41-5A-22,
3304 Code of Alabama 1975.
3305 (b) Provided, however, this section shall not apply to
3306 the Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund or the Coronavirus
3307 Capital Projects Fund provided by the Congress of the United
3308 States to the State of Alabama from the American Rescue Plan
3309 Act of 2021, except for any balance of such funds remaining
3310 from any appropriations made for fiscal year 2026 that remain
3311 unspent at the end of fiscal year 2026 shall be reappropriated
3312 for the same purposes originally appropriated.
Page 115

for the same purposes originally appropriated.
HB218 INTRODUCED
3313 (c) This section shall also not apply to any additional
3314 federal stimulus funds provided to the state in fiscal year
3315 2027 for purposes directly related to the coronavirus
3316 pandemic, other than additional funds provided for existing
3317 federal programs.
3318 Section 13. The Department of Examiners of Public
3319 Accounts is hereby authorized to examine as deemed necessary
3320 all appropriations herein made for compliance with the laws of
3321 the State of Alabama. Any examination performed shall be in
3322 accordance with the provisions of Title 41, Chapter 5A, Code
3323 of Alabama 1975. It is the intent of the Legislature that all
3324 state agencies cooperate with the Examiners of Public Accounts
3325 to provide the information necessary to conduct recovery
3326 audits as provided for in Section 41-5A-6, Code of Alabama
3327 1975.
3328 Section 14. Upon certification to the Director of
3329 Finance by the State Attorney General that a federal court has
3330 ordered the State of Alabama to pay claims, attorney fees, or
3331 other costs relating to said court order, funds are hereby
3332 appropriated to the affected department, board, bureau, or
3333 commission from the appropriate fund or funds of such
3334 department, board, bureau, or commission in the amount
3335 necessary to satisfy that court order. Such appropriations are
3336 in addition to any other appropriation heretofore or hereafter
3337 made in this appropriation act. Such appropriations are
3338 conditioned upon the availability of funds and a determination
3339 by the Director of Finance that existing appropriations are
Page 116

by the Director of Finance that existing appropriations are
HB218 INTRODUCED
3340 not available for the court-ordered payments.
3341 Section 15. All interest earned from funds paid into
3342 Account No. 0396 by Act 87-761, Act 88-947, Act 89-79, Act
3343 90-556, and Act 91-572 are hereby appropriated to the
3344 Governor's Contingency Fund to be spent at the discretion of
3345 the Governor. Any other interest earned by the state from
3346 Revenue Sharing Investments under the State and Local Fiscal
3347 Assistance Act of 1972, as amended, Public Law 92-512, 92nd
3348 Congress, together with any accruals or reversions thereon are
3349 hereby appropriated to the State General Fund.
3350 Section 16. Upon certification to the Director of
3351 Finance by the Director of the Alabama Emergency Management
3352 Agency that a disaster related expenditure was necessary to
3353 ensure life safety and incident stabilization for the State of
3354 Alabama as a result of an all hazard event, to include natural
3355 and man-made hazards, funds are hereby appropriated to the
3356 affected department from the State General Fund or any other
3357 fund necessary to satisfy the expenditure. Such appropriations
3358 are in addition to any other appropriation heretofore and
3359 hereafter made in this appropriation act. Such appropriations
3360 are conditioned upon the availability of funds and a
3361 determination by the Director of Finance that existing
3362 appropriations are not available for the disaster related
3363 expense.
3364 Section 17. All encumbered balances of a previous
3365 fiscal year appropriation, other than the exclusions
3366 authorized by this act or in Section 41-4-93, Code of Alabama
Page 117

authorized by this act or in Section 41-4-93, Code of Alabama
HB218 INTRODUCED
3367 1975, shall lapse no later than September 30 of the fiscal
3368 year immediately following the fiscal year for which the
3369 appropriation was made and shall revert to the credit of the
3370 State General Fund or earmarked fund from which the
3371 appropriation or appropriations were made.
3372 Section 18. The appropriations made herein to the
3373 departments, boards, offices, commissions, and agencies
3374 include the amounts necessary, and said departments, boards,
3375 offices, commissions, and agencies are hereby directed to make
3376 the transfer of funds to the State Personnel Department in
3377 said amounts enumerated in this act. All agencies enumerated
3378 in this act and receiving services from other governmental
3379 agencies enumerated in this act shall make full payment in a
3380 timely manner for such services.
3381 Section 19. All funds collected under Section
3382 40-12-43.1, Code of Alabama 1975, between the effective date
3383 of Act 98-191 and September 30, 2026, are hereby appropriated
3384 to the Auburn University Center for Governmental Services for
3385 the administration of the examiner certification program
3386 established by the Alabama Local Tax Institute of Standards
3387 and Training as provided in Section 40-12-43.1, Code of
3388 Alabama 1975.
3389 Section 20. It is the intent of the Legislature that
3390 the funds appropriated to the Office of the Senate President
3391 Pro Tempore in subsection 6 of Section 3 of this act which are
3392 not otherwise designated may be expended by the Senate
3393 President Pro Tempore for the same purposes as are authorized
Page 118

President Pro Tempore for the same purposes as are authorized
HB218 INTRODUCED
3394 for the Lieutenant Governor pursuant to Section 29-4-50, Code
3395 of Alabama 1975, and the Speaker of the House of
3396 Representatives pursuant to Section 29-4-60, Code of Alabama
3397 1975.
3398 Section 21. The appropriations made herein to the
3399 departments, boards, offices, commissions, and agencies
3400 include the amounts necessary to pay the SEIB. The SEIB rate
3401 shall be $1,175 per month for each full-time employee for the
3402 fiscal year ending September 30, 2027. In addition to the
3403 amounts otherwise appropriated in this act, there is hereby
3404 appropriated from the State General Fund in the same
3405 proportion as the salaries of the several State officials and
3406 employees are paid, additional amounts to pay for the increase
3407 in employer contributions to SEIB. The additional amounts
3408 appropriated in this section from the State General Fund shall
3409 not exceed $18,000,000 for the fiscal year ending September
3410 30, 2027. The Director of Finance shall ensure first priority
3411 shall be given to all State General Fund payrolls, including
3412 the payroll of the legislature. State agencies may receive
3413 additional allocations from the appropriation made in this
3414 section from the State General Fund in amounts necessary to
3415 pay for the increase. The remainder of this appropriation from
3416 the State General Fund may be allocated by the Director of
3417 Finance to those agencies which receive transfers from the
3418 State General Fund. The SEIB shall adjust the insurance
3419 program wherever appropriate to maintain the aforementioned
3420 fixed rate.
Page 119

fixed rate.
HB218 INTRODUCED
3421 Section 22. It is the intent of the Legislature that
3422 the Director of Finance shall notify the Chair of the House
3423 Ways and Means-General Fund Committee, the Chair of the Senate
3424 Finance and Taxation-General Fund Committee, and the
3425 Legislative Fiscal Officer of any interagency transfers, of
3426 any type, including contracting, of any of the funds
3427 appropriated in this act.
3428 Section 23. All nongovernmental entities, identified
3429 by the Legislative Services Agency, which are allocated funds
3430 in Section 3 of this act shall file a report with the Chairs
3431 of the House Ways and Means-General Fund Committee, the Senate
3432 Committee on Finance and Taxation-General Fund, Finance
3433 Director, and the Legislative Fiscal Officer prior to the
3434 start of the 2027 Regular Session, regarding the proposed
3435 expenditures and usage of the funds appropriated in the fiscal
3436 year ending September 30, 2027. The Legislative Services
3437 Agency shall provide notice to the identified nongovernmental
3438 entities within 60 days following enactment of this act
3439 regarding the reporting requirements and the methodology to
3440 submit reports and format to be used, which may include an
3441 online platform.
3442 Section 24. Any state agency providing direct
3443 assistance or support to local governments from state funds
3444 appropriated in this act shall file a report with the Chairs
3445 of the House Ways and Means-General Fund Committee, the Senate
3446 Committee on Finance and Taxation-General Fund, Finance
3447 Director, and the Legislative Fiscal Officer prior to the
Page 120

Director, and the Legislative Fiscal Officer prior to the
HB218 INTRODUCED
3448 start of the 2027 Regular Session, regarding the cost of the
3449 assistance provided with state funds and the amount of local
3450 contribution. The agencies shall also provide copies of any
3451 MOUs between the state agency and the local government.
3452 Section 25. If any section, paragraph, sentence,
3453 clause, provision, or portion of this act or all or any
3454 portion of any appropriations herein made be held
3455 unconstitutional or invalid, it shall not affect any other
3456 section, paragraph, sentence, clause, provision, or portion of
3457 this act or any other appropriation or appropriations or
3458 portion thereof hereby made not in and of itself
3459 unconstitutional or invalid.
3460 Section 26. All laws or parts of laws, general,
3461 special, private, or local that are in conflict with or
3462 inconsistent with the provisions of this act are hereby
3463 expressly repealed.
3464 Section 27. Each agency of the state funded through
3465 the provisions of this act shall provide an equal opportunity
3466 for employment and business opportunities for all citizens of
3467 this state without regard to sex or race.
3468 Section 28. This act shall become effective October 1,
3469 2026.
Page 121